PROMOTING 

TRAVEL 

AN
EXAMINATION  OF  ECONOMIC  AND  SECURITY 
CONCERNS

AMERICA: 

TO 

S.  HRG.  110–79

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JANUARY  31,  2007

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

34–743 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on January 31, 2007 .........................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan .................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

May, James C., President/CEO, Air Transport Association .................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Porter,  Stevan,  President,  The  Americas,  InterContinental  Hotels  Group; 
Chairman, Discover America Partnership .........................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Rasulo,  Jay,  Chairman,  Walt  Disney  Parks  and  Resorts;  Chairman,  Travel 
Industry Association; Chairman, U.S. Travel and Tourism Advisory Board ..
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Tisch,  Jonathan  M.,  Chairman,  Travel  Business  Roundtable;  Chairman/CEO, 
Loews Hotels ........................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
James C. May ...................................................................................................
Stevan Porter ....................................................................................................
Jay Rasulo .........................................................................................................
Jonathan M. Tisch ............................................................................................

Page 
1
1
2
3
3
4
4
25

15
17

5
6

12
14

8
10

33
32
32
31

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PROMOTING  TRAVEL  TO  AMERICA:  AN
AND

ECONOMIC 

EXAMINATION 
OF 
SECURITY  CONCERNS 

WEDNESDAY,  JANUARY  31,  2007

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:50  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  [presiding]  We  will  call  the  hearing  to  order 
today,  this  is  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation.  It’s  a  full  Committee  hearing  on  the  issue  of  pro-
moting  travel  to  our  country  and  an  examination  of  the  economic 
and safety concerns of those issues. 

I  am  joined  by  my  colleague,  the  Chairman  of  the  full  Com-
mittee,  who  has  asked  me  to  chair  this  Committee  hearing.  I  am 
the  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee  that  deals  with  the  issue  of 
tourism. 

I  am  joined  by  the  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye,  and  the  former 

Chairman of this Committee, Senator Stevens. 

I’d  just  like  to  make  some  very  brief  comments,  then  I  will  turn 

to my colleagues, and then we will turn to the witnesses. 

We  welcome  all  of  you  here  today.  A  lot  of  very  important  work 
has been done by organizations and groups dealing with the subject 
of travel and tourism. 

Travel and tourism is a very important part of our economy. It’s 
well  over  a  trillion  dollars  to  the  American  economy,  and  it  pro-
vides many jobs. 

And in the shadow of 9/11 and also in the intervening years with 
the war in Iraq and other issues, we have seen substantial decline 
in  the  share  of  destination  tourism  to  the  United  States  versus 
tourism and travel and tourism around the rest of the world. 

Consequently,  there  is  a  discussion  going  on  in  this  country 
about  what  we  can  do  to  reach  out  to  the  rest  of  the  world,  and 
what  we  can  do  to  promote  travel  and  tourism  in  our  country.  We 
think  it  is  important  to  tell  the  rest  of  the  world,  ‘‘You’re  welcome 
here.  Come  and  see  this  country.  We  have  a  lot  to  offer;  it  is  a 
great, great place.’’ Understanding and seeing America firsthand is 
something,  I  think  that  promotes  greater  understanding  around 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2

the  world  about  who  we  are  and  what  we  are  about.  I  think  all  of 
us  share  a  determination  to  see  how  we  can  better  effectively—or 
more effectively, rather—accomplish that. 

None  of  us,  I  believe,  are  interested,  in  any  way,  in  sacrificing 
security  issues  in  the  name  of  the  economy.  We  understand  that 
what  we  need  to  do,  and  will  do,  in  trying  to  promote  travel  and 
tourism  in  this  country,  has  to  be  consistent  with  the  interests  of 
national security. 

And again, in the shadow of 9/11, the issues of national security 
have  become  ever  more  important.  We  understand  there  is  a  war 
on  terrorism  and  terrorists  going  on—we  want  to  try  to  keep  bad 
people out of this country. We want to have sufficient border secu-
rity  to  try  to  prevent  terrorists  from  entering  our  country.  We  un-
derstand  all  of  that,  and  no  one  is  more  sensitive  to  that  than  my 
two colleagues who have been involved in the security and defense 
issues for many, many decades. 

Although we are certainly familiar with that issue, and cognizant 
of  it,  we—at  the  same  time—believe  that  you  can  develop  an  ap-
proach that recognizes and addresses our security interests, and at 
the same time does more to promote our travel and tourism. 

Many of our allies have engaged in a much more aggressive cam-
paign,  fueled  with  substantial  investment  dollars  to  promote  tour-
ism  to  their  countries,  and  at  about  the  same  time,  we  have—in 
many ways—retracted in this country. 

We used to have a specific agency in the Commerce Department, 
that  was  abolished  in  the  mid-1990s,  to  address  some  of  these 
issues. 

But  we  felt  that  it  was  important  to  both  have  an  early  hearing 
and  have  an  opportunity  to  hear  from  witnesses  about  their  views 
on  this  issue  of  travel  and  tourism  and  promoting  our  country  as 
a destination for tourists. We felt it was important to also examine, 
in the context of that, economic and security issues. 

So,  I’m  pleased  that  witnesses  have  come  forward  to  testify 
today, and Mr. Chairman, thank you for allowing me—as the Sub-
committee  Chairman—to  chair  the  full  Committee  hearing  today. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Dorgan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Today’s  hearing  is  the  first  in  a  series  of  hearings  to  examine  the  reasons  why 
the United States is becoming less competitive in attracting international travelers. 
While  travel  and  tourism  is  America’s  second  largest  services  export  industry  cre-
ating  a  $9.7  billion  balance  of  trade  surplus  in  2005,  other  countries  have  gained 
market  share  to  our  detriment.  In  1992,  the  United  States  had  9.4  percent  of  the 
total  international  travel  market.  In  2004,  that  number  slipped  to  6  percent,  and 
if we do nothing to address this trend we will lose even more market share. 

The  absence  of  Federal  leadership  in  travel  promotion  has  encouraged  states  to 
fill that void, such as the efforts made by my home state of North Dakota. Tourism 
is  an  essential  industry  for  North  Dakota.  It  is  the  state’s  second  largest  industry, 
with  visitors  spending  $3.36  billion  in  2004.  The  investment  that  North  Dakota 
made to encourage travel and tourism has reaped enormous benefits, with the state 
getting  a  return  of  investment  of  almost  $82  for  each  dollar  spent  on  travel  pro-
motion. While states have made inroads to attracting travelers, the lack of a coordi-
nated  Federal  campaign  creates  a  comparative  disadvantage  to  countries  that  have 
centralized ministries or offices to encourage international travel to their countries. 
The example of North Dakota should be a lesson for the entire country. A small in-
vestment has the potential to create a significant windfall for our economy. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3

However, investing in promotion means nothing if the underlying impediments to 
international travel are not addressed. Travel industry leaders have done extensive 
research and polling to find that international travelers believe the process to come 
to  America  is  one  of  the  worst  in  the  world.  The  visa  application  process  has  been 
inefficient,  with  travelers  in  some  countries  having  to  wait  extended  periods  before 
receiving an answer on an application. And if the traveler is successful in obtaining 
a  visa,  he  is  met  by  a  confusing  and  inhospitable  border  and  entry  process.  Word 
of mouth is a powerful thing, and the terrible reputation we have earned is an addi-
tional hurdle to encouraging more people to visit America. It is not just about losing 
destination  tourists.  Businesses  are  losing  clients  to  companies  in  other  countries 
because  of  how  hard  it  is  to  enter  the  United  States.  The  economic  health  of  the 
country  however  must  also  be  balanced  with  homeland  security.  We  should  by  no 
means  decrease  the  security  of  the  Nation  for  economic  gain,  but  I  believe  there  is 
room  to  make  the  visa  and  entry  process  more  efficient  and  welcoming.  Our  com-
petitors in the European Union appear to have found that balance. Our agencies can 
do the same. 

I look forward to listening to today’s witnesses and we will have a second hearing 
in the near future to hear from the State Department and the Department of Home-
land  Security.  I  plan  to  work  with  Chairman  Inouye  and  the  other  members  of  the 
Commerce  Committee  to  examine  these  issues  thoroughly  and  begin  work  on  legis-
lation  to  address  our  competitiveness  in  the  international  travel  sector.  This  is  a 
great country, and we should welcome visitors to our shores to meet our people and 
experience our culture.

Senator Inouye. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. May I ask 

that my full statement be made part of the record? 

Senator DORGAN. Without objection. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  When  I  do  this,  I’d  like  to  note  two  facts.  This 
is  one  of  the  very  few  major  industries  with  a  favorable  trade  bal-
ance  at  a  time  when  our  Nation  is  suffering  from  negative  trade 
balances. I think it’s the only major, industrialized country without 
a  cabinet  position  in  charge.  All  other  countries  have  ministers—
we don’t. 

I  just  hope  that  the  government  of  the  United  States  takes  a 
much more serious look at tourism. Naturally, it’s a major industry 
in Hawaii, but it’s also a major industry in the United States. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Travel and tourism is Hawaii’s number one industry. In 2006, the Hawaii Depart-
ment of Business, Economic Development and Tourism reported $12 billion in tour-
ism revenues—a 3 percent increase over tourism revenue in 2005. 

This  industry  is  just  as  important  for  the  Nation’s  economy  as  it  is  for  Hawaii. 
Travel and tourism is America’s second largest services export industry and its third 
largest  retail  sales  industry,  generating  a  $9.7  billion  balance  of  trade  surplus  in 
2005. 

The  travel  and  tourism  industry  has  shown  resilience  since  the  terrorist  attacks 
of  September  11,  but  America  has  become  a  less  desirable  destination  for  many 
international travelers. 

According  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  in  1992,  the  U.S.  attracted  9.4 

percent of all international tourist arrivals from around the world. 

In 2004, the United States attracted only 6 percent of total international arrivals. 
Success in this industry is unpredictable because of uncontrollable influences such 
as natural or man-made catastrophic events or economic downturns that impact the 
pocketbook of potential travelers. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4

However, there are certain controllable factors such as capital investments, which 
can benefit the industry and help keep it competitive, and we all know a competitive 
industry provides a tremendous economic benefit to our Nation. 

In fact, prior to 1997, the Federal Government made capital investments in tour-
ism  through  coordinated  advertising  to  international  markets,  and  we  remained 
competitive in attracting international visitors. 

To  further  prove  the  point  that  capital  investment  works,  the  decline  in  inter-
national  visits  began  in  1997  when  the  U.S.  Government  stopped  providing  funds 
for international advertising. The Federal Government reinstated funding for inter-
national advertising in 2003, but we have a long way to go to recover the lost world 
market share. 

Another essential component is to ensure our borders are protected for both Amer-
icans  and  visitors.  While  we  must  secure  our  borders,  we  must  do  so  in  a  manner 
that ensures our international friends continue to feel welcome. Many in the travel 
and tourism industry have expressed concerns with the sometimes overly aggressive 
measures  used  by  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  the  Department  of 
State as part of their effort to improve border security. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses  about  how  to  balance  these  impor-

tant goals.

Senator DORGAN. Senator Inouye, thank you very much. 
Senator Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you, and I thank the Chairman for call-
ing  this  hearing,  it’s  a  very  important  hearing  and  these  four  gen-
tlemen have some interesting statements to make. I would ask that 
my statement be put in the record also. 
Senator DORGAN. Without objection. 
Senator  STEVENS.  And  if—unless  one  of  the  witnesses  offers  it—
I  would  offer,  that  the  Blueprint  to  Discover  America  be  entered 
into the record. 

But, I’m looking forward to the witnesses’ statements. Thank you 

very much. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  for  calling  this  hearing  to  discuss  the  important 
role that travel and tourism play in our country’s economy and the current difficul-
ties  it  faces.  This  industry  is  not  only  vital  to  our  two  states  but  it  contributes  a 
great deal to the Nation’s prosperity. 

To  our  witnesses,  I  thank  you  for  being  here  today,  and  appreciate  the  time  and 
energy  each  of  you  has  spent  to  bring  more  visitors  to  the  United  States.  Many  of 
you  have  worked  with  Commerce  Secretary  Gutierrez  in  this  endeavor  and  his  and 
your efforts are appreciated. 

The  travel  and  tourism  industry  is  the  second  largest  private-sector  employer  in 
my state of Alaska. More than 24,000 Alaskan jobs rely on travel and tourism, con-
tributing over $2 billion dollars to the state’s economy each year. 

While attention to transportation security is vital for our country, it is equally im-
portant  that  our  security  not  have  the  unintended  consequence  of  driving  away 
international visitors and commerce. If we do not allow for quick and efficient move-
ment  through  our  transportation  systems  we  may  soon  hamper  a  critical  piece  of 
the Nation’s economy. Our country’s declining share of international visitors may be 
a warning sign that this already may be happening. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  the  results  of  your  report,  and  working  with  both  you 

and the Members of this Committee to address these important issues.

Senator DORGAN. Senator Stevens, thank you very much. 
Let  me  begin  by  calling  on  Mr.  Stevan  Porter,  the  President  of 
the  Americas  for  the  Intercontinental  Hotels  Group,  Chairman, 
Discover  America  Partnership—the  effort  that  my  colleague  from 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5

Alaska  just  mentioned.  Let  me  thank  Mr.  Porter  for  coming  for-
ward, and thank you and so many others for a lot of work that has 
gone into a very impressive proposal. Mr. Porter, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT  OF 

STEVAN  PORTER,  PRESIDENT,  THE
AMERICAS,  INTERCONTINENTAL  HOTELS  GROUP;  CHAIR-
MAN, DISCOVER AMERICA PARTNERSHIP 
Mr.  PORTER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Dorgan,  Chairman  Inouye, 

and Members of the Committee. 

First, just to let you know who IHG is, we are one of the world’s 
largest  hotel  companies,  we  have  a  family  of  seven  brands,  which 
include  Intercontinental,  Crowne  Plaza,  Hotel  Indigo,  Holiday  Inn, 
Holiday  Inn  Express,  Staybridge  Suites  and  Candlewood  Suites. 
Our  Americas  region—which  is  our  largest—is  operated  out  of  our 
headquarters office, in Atlanta, Georgia. 

And,  Chairman  Inouye,  in  preparing  for  today’s  hearing,  I  was 
reminded  within  the  company,  of  the  pioneer  efforts  of  one  of  our 
founders, one of Holiday Inns founders, Bill Walton, who served as 
Vice  Chairman  of  our  board  at  one  point  in  his  career.  And  in  the 
1970s,  we  commissioned  him  to  come  to  Washington  as  the  unoffi-
cial  Ambassador  on  behalf  of  Holiday  Inn,  with  a  straightforward 
mission  then—similar  to  now—to  increase  government  awareness 
of  the  significance  of  the  travel  industry  to  the  United  States.  I 
know he had the privilege of working directly with you during that 
time,  and  I  think  you  got  to  know  him  as  ‘‘Wild  Bill,’’  and  I  would 
like  you  to  know  that  he  sends  his  greetings,  and  he’s  enjoying  a 
well-deserved retirement. 

Now, I come here today with my colleagues as a hotelier, but also 
as a businessman, and as Chairman of the Discover America Part-
nership. My colleagues, Jonathan Tisch, Jay Rasulo, and a number 
of  others,  started  this  partnership  just  last  year  to  highlight  the 
unique  role  that  travel  plays—not  only  in  America’s  economic 
arena—but  also  in  public  diplomacy  efforts,  and  to  respond  to  a 
travel  crisis  that  has  resulted  in  a  17  percent  decline  in  overseas 
travelers to the United States since 9/11. 

That  17  percent—according  to  the  Travel  Industry  Association—
translates to something in the arena of 200,000 jobs, $90 billion in 
spending, and $15 billion in Federal, State and local taxes. 

The  Discover  America  Partnership  believes  that  travel  is  a  crit-
ical  component  of  America’s  economic  security  and  public  diplo-
macy efforts, we also believe it’s time to address this growing crisis, 
and to see international travel for what it truly is—an opportunity. 
To  help  the  United  States  welcome  millions  of  more  visitors  an-
nually,  we’ve  developed  a  three-step  plan  that  can  improve  Amer-
ica’s visa policy, entry procedures and perceptions about the travel 
process. 

I’ll  focus  my  comments  this  afternoon  on  one  step  in  the  plan—
entry  procedures—and  my  colleagues  will  discuss  visa  policy  and 
the need to change perceptions. 

For  many  international  travelers  to  the  United  States,  a  long 
flight  is  followed  by  an  often  daunting  experience—navigating  the 
scrutiny of the United States Customs and Border Protection proc-
ess.  Policies  implemented,  well-intentioned,  over  the  past  5  years, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6

appear to have strengthened our security. Lost, however, have been 
efficiencies, and a semblance of customer service. 

And,  importantly,  lost  are  meaningful  high-economic  impact 
events,  such  as  the  Pan-American  Games,  lost  from  San  Antonio 
and awarded, ultimately, to Brazil. And the United States Olympic 
Committee, as we look ahead, which is one of our members, recog-
nizes  this  as  a  similar  concern  in  pursuing  award  of  the  2016 
Olympics to either Chicago or Los Angeles. 

We’re here today to offer our commitment to work with Congress 
and  the  Administration  to  assure  international  travelers  a  speedy 
and  hassle-free  entry  process;  turn  our  top  inbound  airports  into 
world  models;  bring  the  considerable  expertise  of  the  travel  and 
hospitality industry to provide foreign travelers with a positive first 
impression  of  the  United  States;  and  to  develop  an  effective  inter-
national  registered  traveler  program;  in  short,  America  Welcomes 
You. 

The  specifics  of  how  we  propose  to  implement  these  steps  are—
as  you’ve  already  noted—included  in  the  Blueprint  to  Discover 
America,  which  we  did  submit  to  the  Committee,  along  with  my 
statement,  and  we  would  ask  that  it  be  made  part  of  the  hearing 
record. * 

The  hotel  industry  has  a  track  record  of  stepping  up  to  lend  its 
expertise to managing the challenges facing our Nation. During the 
gasoline shortage of 1973 and 1974, Holiday Inns drew on the local 
knowledge  of  our  hotel  managers  across  the  country,  coupled  with 
our  unique  HOLIDEX  reservation  system,  to  compile  information 
on the availability of gasoline, and to serve as a central data collec-
tion point for the Federal Government. 

Likewise,  when  Hurricane  Katrina  hit  the  Gulf  Coast,  IHG  and 
many  other  hotel  companies  were  quick  to  respond.  We  provided 
housing and meals for rescue workers, refugees, and those working 
to restore critical infrastructure to that ravaged area. 

The  Discover  America  Partnership  seeks  to  continue  that  record 
of  service,  by  lending  the  travel  industry’s  expertise  to  assuring 
that  foreign  visitors  to  this  country  find  their  initial  entry  experi-
ence  as  welcoming  and  positive  as  the  rest  of  their  stay.  We  hope 
that Congress will join with us in making this a high-priority issue. 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Committee 

today, and I’ll be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Porter follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVAN PORTER, PRESIDENT, THE AMERICAS, 

INTERCONTINENTAL HOTELS GROUP; CHAIRMAN, DISCOVER AMERICA PARTNERSHIP 
Chairman Inouye, Members of the Committee, good afternoon. My name is Stevan 
Porter  and  I  am  President,  The  Americas,  of  InterContinental  Hotels  Group  (IHG). 
IHG  is  the  world’s  most  global  hotel  company  with  more  than  3,600  owned,  leased, 
managed  and  franchised  hotels  across  nearly  100  countries  and  territories.  IHG 
owns a portfolio of well-recognized and respected brands including InterContinental 
Hotels and Resorts, Crowne Plaza, Hotel Indigo, Holiday Inn, Holiday Inn Express, 
Staybridge Suites, and Candlewood Suites. IHG’s Americas region is managed from 
our headquarters in Atlanta, Georgia. 

I  am  here  today  not  only  as  a  hotelier,  but  also  as  Chairman  of  the  Discover 
America  Partnership.  My  colleagues  Jonathan  Tisch,  Jay  Rasulo  and  many  others 
started  the  Partnership  last  year  to  highlight  the  unique  role  that  travel  can  play 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7

in  America’s  public  diplomacy  efforts  and  to  respond  to  a  travel  crisis  that  has  re-
sulted in a 17 percent decline in overseas travelers to the U.S. since 9/11. According 
to  the  Travel  Industry  Association,  this  decline  has  resulted  in  a  loss  of  nearly 
200,000  jobs,  $90  billion  in  spending  and  $15  billion  in  Federal,  state  and  local 
taxes. 

The  Discover  America  Partnership  believes  that  travel  is  a  critical  component  of 
America’s  economic  security  and  public  diplomacy  efforts.  It’s  time  to  address  this 
growing crisis and to see international travel for what it is: an opportunity. 

To  help  the  U.S.  welcome  millions  of  more  visitors  annually,  we  have  developed 
a three-step plan that can repair America’s visa policy, entry procedures and percep-
tions  about  the  travel  process.  This  plan  is  based  on  months  of  research,  including 
analyses  of  how  other  countries  address  these  important  issues  and  in-depth  con-
versations with officials in the Departments of Homeland Security, State, Commerce 
and  Transportation.  We  also  spoke  with  more  than  2,000  international  travelers  to 
gain  their  perspective  on  obstacles  to  travel  and  what  the  U.S.  might  do  to  regain 
their business. 

There are several key characteristics of this plan that I would like to bring to your 

attention:

1.  Our  plan  enhances  the  security  of  our  visa  and  entry  process  in  significant 
ways by making needed investments in personnel and technology and by focus-
ing human resources on travelers that pose the greatest threat.
2. Our plan outlines a holistic and user-focused approach to travel policy.
3. Our plan calls for relatively modest investments and changes to achieve revo-
lutionary  results.  An  annual  investment  of  approximately  $300  million  would 
cover the bulk of these proposals. Many of these proposals will actually achieve 
savings  in  other  areas,  by  allowing  government  agencies  to  re-deploy  resources 
elsewhere.  The  potential  return  on  this  investment  is  tens  of  billions  of  dollars 
for the economy, billions of dollars in added tax revenues and hundreds of thou-
sands of new jobs.

Please allow me to focus on one step in this plan: entry procedures. My colleagues 

will discuss visa policy and the need to change perceptions. 

For  many  international  travelers  to  the  United  States,  a  long  flight  is  followed 
by  a  daunting  experience:  navigating  the  scrutiny  of  the  U.S.  Customs  and  Border 
Protection  process.  Policies  implemented  over  the  past  5  years  appear  to  have 
strengthened America’s border security. Lost, however, have been efficiencies and a 
semblance of customer service. 

I am here today to offer our commitment to work with Congress and the Adminis-
tration  to  assure  international  travelers  a  speedy  and  hassle-free  entry  process;  to 
turn our top inbound airports into world models; to bring the considerable expertise 
of  the  travel  and  hospitality  industry  to  providing  foreign  travelers  with  a  positive 
first  impression  of  the  United  States;  and  to  develop  an  effective  international  reg-
istered-traveler  program.  The  specifics  of  how  we  propose  to  implement  these  steps 
are  included  in  the  ‘‘Blueprint  to  Discover  America’’  which  I  have  submitted  to  the 
Committee  along  with  my  statement.  I  ask  that  it  be  made  part  of  the  hearing 
record. * 

The hotel industry has a track record of stepping up to lend its expertise to man-
aging the challenges facing our Nation. During the gasoline shortage of 1973–1974, 
Holiday  Inn  drew  on  the  local  knowledge  of  its  hotel  managers  across  the  country 
coupled  with  its  then-unique  HOLIDEX  national  reservation  system,  to  compile  in-
formation  on  the  availability  of  gasoline  and  to  serve  as  a  central  data  collection 
point  for  the  Federal  Government.  Likewise,  when  Hurricane  Katrina  hit  the  Gulf 
Coast, IHG and other hotel companies were quick to respond, providing housing and 
meals for rescue workers, refugees, and those working to restore critical infrastruc-
ture to the area. 

The  Discover  America  Partnership  seeks  to  continue  that  record  of  service  by 
lending the travel industry’s expertise to assuring that foreign visitors to this coun-
try find their initial entry experience as welcoming and positive as the rest of their 
stay. We hope that Congress will join with us in making this a priority issue. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Committee  today.  I  would  be 

happy to answer any questions you may have.

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Porter, thank you very much for your testi-

mony. 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8

Next  we  will  hear  from  Jonathan  Tisch,  who  is  Chairman  and 
CEO  of  Loews  Hotel.  He  has  been  involved  in  the  effort  that  has 
just been described. 

Mr. Tisch, you may proceed. 

JONATHAN  M. 

STATEMENT  OF 

TISCH,  CHAIRMAN,
TRAVEL  BUSINESS  ROUNDTABLE;  CHAIRMAN/CEO,  LOEWS 
HOTELS 
Mr.  TISCH.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senators  Dorgan,  Stevens,  and  Lau-
tenberg,  thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with 
you  and  discuss  the  issues  that  are  important  to  the  travel  and 
tourism industry, and more importantly, to our entire country. 

I  am,  as  the  Senator  mentioned,  Jonathan  Tisch,  the  Chairman 
and  CEO  of  Loews  Hotels,  and  I  also  serve  as  Chairman  of  the 
Travel  Business  Roundtable,  a  CEO-driven  organization  whose 
mission is to raise the visibility of the travel and tourism industry 
here  on  Capitol  Hill,  and  around  the  country,  and  to  discuss  the 
economic and social contributions which are vast, that our industry 
makes  to  this  country  of  ours.  And  I  also  serve  as  Chairman  of 
NYC  &  Company,  which  is  New  York  City’s  travel,  tourism,  and 
visitors’ agency. 

Along  with  our  strategic  partner,  the  Travel  Industry  Associa-
tion, we represent all sectors of the U.S. travel and tourism indus-
try, as Steve just mentioned, an industry that has in excess of $703 
billion  in  expenditures,  and  employs  about  7.5  million  Americans 
directly,  and  about  another  10  million  more  Americans  indirectly. 
As  a  member  of  the  Discover  America  Partnership  leadership 
group,  I  thank  you  for  allowing  my  colleagues  and  me  the  oppor-
tunity to present before this Committee today. 

Steve  has  just  articulated  the  challenge,  and  has  described  the 
second part of our Blueprint for change. If I might, let’s take a step 
back  and  review  step  one—reforming  America’s  visa  issuance  sys-
tem. 

The State Department has put in place new programs and added 
staff  to  facilitate  the  visa  process  since  September  11,  2001.  How-
ever,  the  U.S.  inbound  travel  market  from  overseas  still  lags  be-
hind  the  pre-9/11  levels,  so  that  shows  us  that  more  can,  and 
should, be done. 

Before  they  ever  have  the  opportunity  to  set  foot  on  American 
soil, most international travelers—those that are not living in coun-
tries that are part of the Visa Waiver Program—must obtain a non-
immigrant  visitor  visa.  Two  hurdles  are  large  in  this  process—the 
distance  from  consular  posts,  and  wait-times  for  interviews.  And 
they  have  all  too  often  made  obtaining  a  visa  cumbersome,  and  in 
some cases are re-directing travelers to other destinations. 

Following  September  11th,  every  visa  applicant  was  required  to 
have an in-person interview with a U.S. consular official. In places 
such  as  Brazil  and  India,  with  a  total  land  mass  equal,  or  in  ex-
cess, to the United States, there are only four consulates in the en-
tire country. 

In  these  cases,  potential  visitors  to  the  U.S.  must  take  a  trip, 
just  to  be  considered  for  the  right  to  visit  us  here  in  the  United 
States. In 2005, the National Foreign Trade Council estimated that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9

U.S. businesses lost $30 billion between 2002 and 2004, because of 
America’s visa system. 

According  to  the  U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office,  during 
a  recent  6-month  period  in  2006,  97  of  the  211  visa  issuing  posts 
were  reporting  wait  times  in  excess  of  30  days,  and  9  posts  had 
wait times of over 90 days. Clearly, this is unacceptable. Especially 
when  the  State  Department’s  own  goal  is  to  have  wait  times  of  30 
days or less. 

As  recently  as  November  of  last  year,  the  wait  times  in  India 
were as high as 184 days. Due to additional staffing resources, the 
State Department was able to process the backlogs and reduce wait 
times  to  under  1  week  in  three  of  the  four  consulates.  We’re 
pleased  to  see  the  progress  has  been  somewhat  sustained.  This 
model should be applied to other problem locations, such as Mexico 
and Brazil. For all of the reasons Steve just laid out, we need more 
international  visitors,  not  fewer,  to  come  to  the  United  States.  We 
have  the  capability  of  welcoming  more  visitors,  while  at  the  same 
time, strengthening our security. 

In our Blueprint, we lay out four recommendations for improving 
the  visa  process,  while  enhancing—enhancing—security.  Number 
one,  reduce  wait  times  at  all  consular  posts  to  less  than  30  days. 
Number  two,  use  technology  for  visa  processing  where  distances 
are  excessive.  Number  three,  strengthen  and  expand  the  Visa 
Waiver Program; and, number four, enhance security and efficiency 
upon entry into and exit from the United States. 

First,  we  are  challenging  the  State  Department  to  meet  their 
own  standard,  and  cut  the  wait  times  down  to  30  days  or  less  at 
consular posts. And we suggest several ways to do that. 

For  those  posts  with  recurring  problems,  ‘‘rapid  response’’  teams 
could be deployed. Consular officials and trained experts should be 
sent to handle the demand, similar to State’s response in India. 

We  also  believe  that  Congress  should  take  an  active  role  to  as-
sess  the  needs  of  consular  offices  overseas,  and  adequately  fund 
staffing demands. 

Our second recommendation is adapting 21st century technology, 
which  is  videoconferencing  and  Internet  applications  to  better  fa-
cilitate the visa process, and to lessen the hassle for visa applicants 
in  geographically  large  countries,  as  I  mentioned,  such  as  Brazil, 
China, Russia, and India. 

In  fact,  videoconferencing  for  visa  interviews  was  one  of  the  ini-
tiatives outlined in Secretary of State Rice and Secretary Chertoff’s 
Secure Borders and Open Doors Plan, which was announced a year 
ago, in January of 2006. 

For  these  plans  to  succeed,  we  ask  that  Congress  enact  legisla-
tion  that  allows  for  the  use  of  technology  and  new  methods  of  col-
lecting  information,  when  the  appropriate  security  controls  are  in 
place, to facilitate interviews and other background checks. 

Additionally,  the  reemergence  of  using  American  Chambers  of 
Commerce overseas to expedite visa issuance for business travelers 
has been successful, and that progress should continue. 

The  third  element  for  visa  reform  is  strengthening  our  Visa 
Waiver  Program,  which  allows  travelers  from  lower-risk  coun-
tries—our best trading partners—to come here without obtaining a 
visa.  The  VWP  is  essential  for  keeping  our  doors  open  to  inter-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10

national  travelers.  Two-thirds  of  all  overseas  travelers  to  the 
United  States  come  from  Visa  Waiver  countries.  By  expanding  the 
program, we can welcome more travelers, while consular resources 
can better be prioritized for higher risks. 

The President recently announced that his plan is to do just that. 
By opening the Program to more of our allies, while requiring more 
personal information from travelers for security purposes, we boost 
our economy, our diplomacy, and our security all at the same time. 
Our  last  visa  recommendation  is  already  being  addressed  by  the 
Federal Government, and that is creating an effective exit tracking 
system. Today, our government is wary of letting more visitors into 
the  country,  because  we  are  not  sure  if  they  will  ever  leave.  The 
US–VISIT  program  has  been  an  excellent  example  of  using  21st 
century  technology  to  protect  our  borders,  but  the  exit  component 
is  still  incomplete.  We  must  build  on  this  technology  to  carefully 
monitor  the  entry  and  exit  of  travelers,  but  to  do  so  in  a  way  that 
does not hinder travel. 

It’s  time  we  use  the  resources  at  our  disposal,  and  execute  the 

same concept at our visa posts, and at our ports of entry. 

In  conclusion,  Senators,  this  Blueprint  lays  out  a  comprehensive 
plan that strengthens our national security, at the same time, bol-
sters  our  economy,  and  creates  more  jobs  here  at  home.  By  taking 
these  actions,  and  communicating  such  progress  to  the  public,  we 
will  also  help  turn  around  the  negative  perceptions  of  America. 
Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Tisch follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JONATHAN M. TISCH, CHAIRMAN, TRAVEL BUSINESS 

ROUNDTABLE, CHAIRMAN/CEO, LOEWS HOTELS 

Introduction 

Good  afternoon.  Chairman  Inouye  and  Ranking  Member  Stevens,  I  would  like  to 
thank  you  and  Senator  Dorgan  for  your  attention  to  the  travel  challenges  America 
is currently experiencing and for holding today’s hearing. 

I am Jonathan Tisch, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Loews Hotels, and 
Chairman of the Travel Business Roundtable, a CEO-based organization whose mis-
sion  is  to  educate  policymakers  about  the  important  social  and  economic  contribu-
tions of the U.S. travel industry. 

Along  with  our  strategic  partner,  the  Travel  Industry  Association  (TIA),  we  rep-
resent  all  sectors  of  the  U.S.  travel  and  tourism  industry—an  industry  that  has 
$703  billion  in  expenditures,  employs  7.5  million  Americans  and  has  untapped  po-
tential for winning hearts and minds of people from around the world. 

Along  with  this  testimony,  I  would  like  to  submit  the  ‘‘Blueprint  to  Discover 

America’’ as part of my statement for the record. 
Need for a 21st Century Visa System 

As  a  member  of  the  Discover  America  Partnership’s  Leadership,  I  thank  you  for 
allowing  my  colleagues  and  me  the  opportunity  to  present  before  this  Committee 
today. I would like to describe for you step one of our blueprint for change: reform-
ing America’s visa issuance system. 

The State Department has put in place new programs and added staff to facilitate 
the  visa  process  since  9/11.  Some  progress  has  been  made.  However,  the  U.S.  in-
bound  travel  market  from  overseas  still  lags  behind  pre-9/11  levels.  More  can  and 
should be done. 

Overseas travel to the U.S. has declined 17 percent since 2001 while travel world-
wide  is  steadily  on  the  rise.  A  recent  survey  conducted  by  the  Discover  America 
Partnership  showed  that  international  travelers  are  74  percent  more  likely  to  have 
a favorable opinion of the U.S. if they have actually visited here. In addition, those 
2,000  travelers  surveyed  indicated  they  were  61  percent  more  likely  to  support  the 
U.S.  and  its  policies  after  having  visited.  Clearly,  we  need  more  international  trav-
elers; they strengthen our economy, our diplomacy and our security. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11

Before  most  international  travelers  (those  not  part  of  the  Visa  Waiver  Program) 
ever  have  the  opportunity  to  set  foot  on  American  soil,  they  must  obtain  a  non-im-
migrant visitor visa. Two hurdles in this process—distance from consular posts and 
wait  times  for  interviews—have  all  too  often  made  obtaining  a  visa  cumbersome, 
and in some cases are redirecting travelers to other destinations. 

Following  9/11,  every  visa  applicant  was  required  to  have  an  in-person  interview 
with  a  U.S.  consular  official.  In  places  such  as  Brazil  and  India—with  a  total  land 
mass  equal  to  or  in  excess  of  the  United  States—there  are  only  four  consulates  in 
the  entire  country.  In  these  cases,  potential  visitors  to  the  U.S.  must  take  a  trip 
just to be considered for the right to visit the U.S. 

According  to  the  U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO),  during  a  recent 
six-month period in 2006, 97 of the 211 visa-issuing posts were reporting wait times 
in excess of 30 days, and nine posts with wait times over 90 days. This is unaccept-
able,  especially  when  the  State  Department’s  own  goal  is  to  have  wait  times  of  30 
days or less. 

As  recently  as  November  of  last  year,  the  wait  times  in  India  were  as  high  184 
days.  Due  to  additional  staffing  and  resources,  the  State  Department  was  able  to 
process  the  backlogs  and  reduce  wait  times  to  under  1  week  in  three  of  the  four 
consulates.  We  are  pleased  to  see  that  progress  has  been  mostly  sustained.  This 
model  should  be  applied  to  other  locations  with  lengthy  wait  times  such  as  Mexico 
and Brazil. 

Hurdles  in  the  visa  process  have  had  an  economic  toll  as  well.  In  2005,  the  Na-
tional Foreign Trade Council estimated that U.S. businesses lost $30 billion between 
2002  and  2004  because  of  America’s  visa  system.  We  need  more  international  visi-
tors,  not  fewer,  to  come  to  the  U.S.,  and  we  have  the  capability  of  welcoming  more 
visitors while at the same time strengthening our security. 

In this ‘‘Blueprint to Discover America,’’ we lay out four recommendations for im-

proving the visa process while enhancing security:

1. Reduce wait times at all consular posts to less than 30 days;
2. Use technology for visa processing where travel distances are excessive;
3. Strengthen and expand the visa waiver program; and
4. Enhance security and efficiency upon entry into and exit from the U.S.

Reduce Wait Times 

First,  we  are  challenging  the  State  Department  to  meet  their  own  standard  and 
cut the wait times to 30 days or less at all consular posts. We suggest several ways 
to  do  that.  For  those  posts  with  recurring  problems,  ‘‘rapid  response’’  teams  should 
be deployed. Consular officials and trained experts should be sent to handle the de-
mand—similar  to  State’s  response  in  India.  We  also  believe  that  Congress  should 
take  an  active  role  to  assess  the  needs  at  consular  offices  overseas  and  adequately 
fund staffing demands. 
Bridge the Distance for Interviews 

Our  second  recommendation  is  adapting  21st  Century  technology,  such  as 
videoconferencing and Internet applications, to better facilitate the visa process and 
to  lessen  the  hassle  for  visa  applicants  in  geographically  large  countries  such  as 
Brazil,  China,  Russia,  and  India.  In  fact,  videoconferencing  for  visa  interviews  was 
one of the initiatives outlined in Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice and DHS Sec-
retary Michael Chertoff’s ‘‘Secure Borders and Open Doors’’ plan, announced in Jan-
uary 2006. 

For these plans to succeed, we ask that Congress enact legislation that allows for 
the  use  of  technology  and  new  methods  of  collecting  information—when  the  appro-
priate  security  controls  are  in  place—to  facilitate  interviews  and  other  background 
checks.  Additionally,  the  re-emergence  of  using  American  Chambers  of  Commerce 
overseas  to  expedite  visa  issuance  for  business  travelers  has  been  successful.  That 
progress should continue. 
Strengthen and Expand Visa Waiver Travel 

The  third  element  for  visa  reform  is  strengthening  our  Visa  Waiver  Program 
(VWP),  which  allows  travelers  from  lower-risk  countries—our  best  trading  part-
ners—to  come  here  without  obtaining  a  visa.  The  VWP  is  essential  for  keeping  our 
doors  open  to  international  travel.  Two-thirds  of  all  overseas  travel  to  the  U.S. 
comes from VWP countries. 

By  expanding  the  program,  we  can  welcome  more  travelers  while  consular  re-
sources can be better prioritized for higher risks. The President recently announced 
his plan to do just that. By opening the program to more of our allies while requir-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12

ing  more  personal  information  from  travelers  for  security  purposes,  we  boost  our 
economy, our diplomacy and our security all at the same time. 
Expand Upon US–VISIT 

Our last visa recommendation is already being addressed by the Federal Govern-
ment, and that is creating an effective exit tracking system. Today our government 
is wary of letting more visitors into the country because we are not sure if they are 
going to leave. The US–VISIT program has been an excellent example of using 21st 
Century  technology  to  protect  our  borders,  but  the  exit  component  is  still  incom-
plete. 

We must build on this technology to carefully monitor the entry and exit of trav-
elers, but do so in a way that does not hinder travel. It is time we use the resources 
at  our  disposal  and  execute  the  same  concept  at  our  visa  posts  and  at  our  ports  of 
entry. 
Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  this  blueprint  lays  out  a  comprehensive  plan  that  strengthens  our 
Nation’s security and at the same time bolsters our economy and creates more jobs 
here at home. By taking these actions and communicating such progress to the pub-
lic, we will also help turn around the negative perceptions of America.

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tisch, thank you very much. 
Next,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Jay  Rasulo,  who  is  Chairman  of 
Walt Disney Parks and Resorts, and Chairman of the Travel Indus-
try Association, and Chairman of the U.S. Travel and Tourism Ad-
visory Board. 

Mr. Rasulo, thank you for joining us. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT  OF  JAY  RASULO,  CHAIRMAN,  WALT  DISNEY 
PARKS  AND  RESORTS;  CHAIRMAN,  TRAVEL  INDUSTRY
ASSOCIATION;  CHAIRMAN,  U.S.  TRAVEL  AND  TOURISM
ADVISORY BOARD 
Mr. RASULO. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
On  behalf  of  the  Nation’s  travel  and  tourism  industry,  I  appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  discuss  our  plan  to 
increase  the  economic  and  diplomatic  benefits  of  travel  to  the  U.S. 
I  speak  from  three  perspectives:  First,  as  National  Chairman  of 
the  Travel  Industry  Association,  which  represents  the  $600  billion 
U.S. travel industry. 

I  also  serve  as  Chairman  of  the  U.S.  Travel  and  Tourism  Advi-
sory  Board.  This  is  a  panel  of  the  industry’s  top  CEOs  that  is 
charged  with  advising  the  Department  of  Commerce  on  the  cre-
ation of a national strategy to compete for greater market share of 
the growing world travel and tourism market. 

And  finally,  I’m  Chairman  of  Walt  Disney  Parks  and  Resorts, 
which  operates  11  theme  parks  on  three  continents,  a  top-rated 
cruise line, and 32,000 hotel rooms. Here in the U.S., our vacation 
businesses  are  responsible  for  creating  175,000  jobs,  while  contrib-
uting  nearly  $9  billion  in  economic  revenue  each  year  to  the  local 
economies. 

The challenge that has been described today is not merely an in-
dustry  challenge,  or  even  a  private-sector  challenge,  it’s  America’s 
challenge,  one  that  both  government  and  the  private  sector  must 
address together. 

When  it  comes  to  security  and  ease  of  travel,  people  sometimes 
mistakenly  believe  that  we  must  choose  one  or  the  other—that  we 
can’t have both. 

The  Blueprint  we’ve  created  shows  that  it  is  well  within  Amer-
ica’s reach to be both more secure, and more welcoming. As my col-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13

leagues have described, the solution proposed must unfold in three 
steps.  First,  we  must  keep  the  visa  process  secure,  but  make  it 
more user-friendly. Second, we must strengthen the security of our 
entry process, but make it more welcoming, and efficient. 

But  it’s  not  enough  to  fix  the  problem.  We  must  also  tell  the 
world  that  we’ve  done  it,  because  negative  perceptions  have  a 
funny way of lingering long after the reality has changed. 

That’s why the third step of this process must be the creation of 
a nationally coordinated program that communicates these changes 
to the world. 

In  preparing  the  Blueprint  to  Discover  America,  we  conducted 
quite a bit of research to understand why people are avoiding trav-
eling to the U.S. And it was very clear to us that the confusion and 
misperception about the entry experience are significant deterrents 
to international visitation. 

The  Western  Hemisphere  Travel  Initiative  is  a  perfect  example. 
This  new  law  requires  a  passport  from  and  to—for  travel  to  and 
from  Canada—and  is  causing  considerable  anxiety  and  confusion 
among travelers. Their confusion is unnecessary, and it’s amplified 
because  the  U.S.  has  no  dedicated  resources  to  communicate  these 
changes,  to  counter  misperceptions,  and  to  help  people  understand 
and navigate the process. 

The  government  agencies  are,  individually,  doing  what  they  can 
on  their  existing  budgets,  and  so  is  the  private  sector.  Many  com-
panies,  like  Disney,  are  dedicating  marketing  and  sales  resources 
toward  getting  the  word  out.  The  Travel  Industry  Association  has 
even  set  up  a  website  called  ‘‘get  a  passport  now’’  which  has  been 
visited more than a million times. 

But  none  of  this  is  any  substitute  for  a  well-funded,  nationally 
coordinated  program  that  communicates  these  policies  with  a  sin-
gle voice. In fact, this is something that virtually every other indus-
trialized country in the world is already doing. 

Australia,  for  instance,  spends  $113  million  a  year  commu-
nicating  and  promoting  itself  to  travelers.  Canada  spends  $58  mil-
lion a year. But, the U.S. currently has no such program. 

We envision the creation of a new federally chartered public-pri-
vate  entity.  It  would  combine  the  expertise  of  the  private  sector 
with  the  oversight  and  coordination  of  the  Federal  Government.  It 
would serve as the primary voice for all travel-related policies, and 
it  would  also  coordinate  our  national  strategies  to  maximize  the 
benefits of travel to America. 

This  program  would  fill  a  vital  gap  in  our  current  strategies  to 
attract  more  visitors,  and  it  would  pay  for  itself  many  times  over. 
We estimate that almost all of the recommendations in our Blue-
print  could  be  implemented  at  a  total  cost  of  under  $300  million 
a year. If these changes resulted in an increase of only one million 
visitors, the additional tax revenue would cover the investment. 

If  we  recaptured  10  million  new  visitors,  which  represents  little 
more than one additional share point of world travel, the added tax 
revenue  would  be  ten  times  what  we  invest,  and  that  doesn’t  in-
clude the tens of billions of dollars added to the economy, and hun-
dreds of thousands of new jobs. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14

But this effort also serves a larger national purpose. It would ad-
vance  America’s  public  diplomacy—the  public  face  we  present  to 
the world. 

Where I work, we often talk about the magic of Disney, but there 
is also a magic to America. People simply need to visit here to feel 
this  magic.  Our  research  has  found  that  traveling  to  the  United 
States  makes  a  visitor  74  percent  more  likely  to  feel  extremely  fa-
vorably  about  this  Nation.  If  we  can  get  people  through  the  gate, 
we can change their perceptions of America. 

Imagine  the  goodwill  that  will  result  if  we  simply  let  people 
know  we  want  them  to  come.  Imagine  the  benefits  that  will  flow 
to  our  Nation  if  peoples  around  the  globe  know  that  America  re-
mains an open, friendly, pleasant place to visit. 

Again,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  here  today,  and 

I look forward to addressing your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Rasulo follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAY RASULO,  CHAIRMAN,  WALT DISNEY PARKS AND
RESORTS;  CHAIRMAN,  TRAVEL INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION;  CHAIRMAN,  U.S.  TRAVEL 
AND TOURISM ADVISORY BOARD 
Mr. Chairman, on behalf of the Nation’s travel and tourism industry, I appreciate 
the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  discuss  our  plan  to  increase  the  economic 
and diplomatic benefits of travel to the U.S. 

I speak today from three perspectives. 
First, as 2006 Chairman of the Travel Industry Association, which represents the 

$600 billion U.S. travel industry. 

I  also  serve  as  Chairman  of  the  U.S.  Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory  Board.  This 
is a panel of the industry’s top CEOs that is charged with advising the Department 
of  Commerce  on  the  creation  of  a  national  strategy  to  compete  for  a  greater  share 
of the growing world travel and tourism market. 

And  finally,  I  am  Chairman  of  Walt  Disney  Parks  and  Resorts,  which  operates 
11 theme parks on three continents, a top-rated cruise line, and 32,000 hotel rooms. 
Here  in  the  U.S.,  our  vacation  businesses  are  responsible  for  creating  175,000  jobs, 
while contributing nearly nine billion dollars in economic revenue each year to their 
local economies. 

The  challenge  that  has  been  described  today  is  not  merely  an  industry  challenge 
or even a private sector challenge—it is America’s challenge—one that both govern-
ment and the private sector must address together. 

When it comes to security and ease of travel, people sometimes mistakenly believe 
we  must  choose  one  or  the  other—that  we  can’t  have  both.  I  believe  this  is  a  false 
choice.  And  the  blueprint  we  have  created  shows  that  it  is  well  within  America’s 
reach to be both more secure and more welcoming. 

As  my  colleagues  have  described,  the  solution  we  propose  must  unfold  in  three 

First, we must keep the visa process secure, but make it more user-friendly. 
Second,  we  must  strengthen  the  security  of  our  entry  process,  but  make  it  more 

steps. 

welcoming and efficient. 

But it’s not enough to fix the problem. We must also tell the world we did it, be-
cause  negative  perceptions  have  a  funny  way  of  lingering  long  after  the  reality  has 
changed. 

That’s  why  the  third  step  in  this  process  must  be  the  creation  of  a  nationally  co-

ordinated program that communicates these changes to the world. 

In  preparing  the  Blueprint  to  Discover  America,  we  conducted  quite  a  bit  of  re-
search to understand why people are avoiding traveling to the U.S. And it was very 
clear  to  us  that  confusion  and  misperceptions  about  the  entry  experience  are  a  far 
bigger deterrent than the processes themselves. 

The Western Hemisphere Travel Initiative is a perfect example. This new law re-
quires a passport for travel to and from Canada—and it is causing considerable anx-
iety  and  confusion  among  travelers.  Their  confusion  is  unnecessarily  amplified  be-
cause the U.S. has no dedicated resources to communicate these changes, to counter 
misperceptions and help people understand and navigate the process. 

The government agencies are individually doing what they can with their existing 
budgets, and so is the private sector. Many companies—including Disney—are dedi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15

cating  marketing  and  sales  resources  toward  getting  the  word  out.  The  Travel  In-
dustry Association has even set up a website called ‘‘get a passport now,’’ which has 
been visited more than a million times. 

But  none  of  this  is  any  substitute  for  a  well-funded,  nationally  coordinated  pro-

gram that communicates these policies with a single voice. 

In  fact,  this  is  something  that  virtually  every  other  industrialized  country  in  the 
world  is  already  doing.  Australia,  for  instance,  spends  $113  million  dollars  a  year 
communicating and promoting itself to travelers. Canada spends $58 million dollars. 
But the U.S. currently has no such program. 

We envision the creation of a new public-private entity. We could call it, perhaps, 

the Corporation to Discover America. 

It would combine the expertise of the private sector with the oversight and coordi-
nation of the Federal Government. It would serve as the primary voice for all travel-
related policies, and it would also coordinate our national strategies to maximize the 
benefits of travel to America. 

This program would fill a vital gap in our current strategies to attract more visi-

tors. And it would pay for itself many times over. 

We estimate that almost all of the recommendations in our Blueprint could be im-
plemented  at  a  total  cost  of  under  $300  million  a  year.  If  these  changes  resulted 
in an increase of only 1 million visitors, the additional tax revenue would cover the 
investment. 

If we recapture 10 million new visitors—which represents little more than one ad-
ditional  share-point  of  world  travel—the  added  tax  revenues  would  be  ten  times 
what  we  invest.  And  that  doesn’t  include  tens  of  billions  of  dollars  added  to  the 
economy, and hundreds of thousands of new jobs. 

But  this  effort  also  serves  a  larger  national  purpose.  It  would  advance  America’s 

public diplomacy—the public face we present to the world. 

Where I work, we often talk about the magic of Disney, but there is also a magic 
to  America.  People  simply  need  to  visit  here  to  feel  this  magic.  Our  research  has 
found that traveling to the United States makes a visitor 74 percent more likely to 
feel extremely favorably about this Nation. 

If  we  can  get  people  through  the  gate,  we  can  change  their  perceptions  of  Amer-

Imagine the goodwill that will result if we simply let people know we want them 

ica. 

to come. 

Imagine the benefits that will flow to our Nation if other peoples around the globe 

know that America remains an open, friendly, pleasant place to visit. 

Again,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  here  today,  and  I  look  forward 

to addressing your questions.

Senator  DORGAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  understand  I  mis-

pronounced your name, it’s Mr. Rasulo. 

Mr. RASULO. Quite all right, thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you for being with us, Mr. Rasulo. 
Finally, we will hear from James May. Jim May is President and 

CEO of the Air Transport Association. 

Jim, thank you and welcome. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, AIR 

TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION 

Mr. MAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
My name normally isn’t mispronounced, it’s easy. How’s that? 
Thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman 

Stevens and Members of the Committee. 

We’ve heard testimony about the ‘‘Blueprint to Discover America’’ 
today.  And  the  three  main  goals,  which  are  a  faster  and  more  se-
cure  visa  system,  more  rapid  processing  of  passengers  at  airports, 
and  creating  a  more  welcoming  environment  for  international  pas-
sengers. These are goals that we can agree upon. 

The  good  news  is  that,  and  I’m  sure  it  is  the  result  of  a  lot  of 
work  by  the  Partnership  members  at  this  table  and  others,  many 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

of these goals are, in fact, being addressed by several Federal agen-
cies. 

16

A  quick  review  tells  us  that  there  are  many  committed  people 
working  together  on  these  issues,  both  within  the  Administration, 
the travel and hospitality industry, and certainly, the airlines. 

The  Rice-Chertoff  Initiative,  the  DHS/State  Department  ‘‘Secure 
Borders,  Open  Doors’’  initiative,  the  US–VISIT  program,  and  the 
Commerce  Department’s  U.S.  Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory  Board 
have  all  focused  on  these  same  goals  to  improve  the  international 
traveler experience. 

These  government  initiatives,  which  include  E-passports,  model 
airports,  developing  a  ‘‘single  portal’’  for  transmission  of  passenger 
information,  adding  new  consular  positions,  and  decreasing  the 
wait  time  for  visa  applicants,  are  all  needed  to  go  a  long  way  to-
ward improving that passenger experience. 

And  as  I  compare  the  government’s  programs  with  the  objective 
of the Blueprint, I feel that those Blueprint objectives are, in fact—
although  in  a  different  way—being  addressed.  Having  noted  the 
consistency  of  objectives  between  the  Blueprint  and  many  govern-
ment initiatives, I think there is also one glaring inconsistency. 

The Blueprint to Discover America runs counter to one of the key 
recommendations  set  forth  by  the  Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory 
Board  which  a  couple  of  months  ago,  raised  concerns  about  impos-
ing  taxes  on  passengers.  It  explained  how  new  taxes  can  ‘‘increase 
the cost of travel and can dampen demand for inbound travel.’’

The  Partnership’s  Blueprint  suggests  that  their  new  objectives 
can be met with an investment of some $300 million to underwrite 
such  initiatives  as  training  CBP  and  TSA  officials  in  ‘‘customer 
service techniques.’’

It  goes  on  to  suggest  that  all  of  the  initiatives  could  be  paid  for 
with  a  $5  fee  for  ‘‘all  travelers  leaving  the  United  States  via  air,’’ 
or  with  a  charge  of  approximately  $10  added  to  the  cost  of  ‘‘pur-
chasing  the  airline  ticket.’’  Now,  in  fairness,  the  Blueprint  also  of-
fers  a  third  funding  alternative,  which  is  the  issuance  of  about  $1 
billion in tax credit bonds. 

In  my  view,  these  fee  proposals  are  wrong-headed  and  counter-
intuitive.  Why  would  we  want  to  charge  passengers  more  at  the 
very time we’re trying to encourage more of them to visit the U.S.? 
It  simply  does  not  make  sense.  I’d  like  to  remind  the  Committee 
that  international  airline  passengers  are,  today,  paying  approxi-
mately $50 in U.S. taxes and fees for each and every trip to Amer-
ica. In 2006, that number generated roughly $3.3 billion to $3.7 bil-
lion. 

Now,  what  passengers  should  expect  for  that  $50,  is  an  efficient 
system to get them through our airports, painlessly. If more needs 
to  be  done  to  expedite  handling  airline  passengers,  and  processing 
visas—and  I  think  it  does—then  the  Federal  Government  needs  to 
underwrite these efforts, not passengers. 

The  Blueprint  also  says  that  ‘‘all  foreign  travelers  to  the  United 
States  should  be  greeted  at  the  inspection  booth  with  the  words, 
’Welcome  to  the  United  States’.’’  While  I  appreciate  a  warm  wel-
come  as  much  as  the  next  person  does,  it’s  hard  for  me  to  support 
charging  passengers  a  $5  fee  to  purchase  a  smile  and  a  greeting. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17

The ATA strongly favors securing America’s borders, and we can 
do  that  by  eliminating  inadequate  processes,  and  transitioning  to 
an  electronic  visa  application  form,  making  visa  appointments  on-
line, sharing data among government agencies to avoid duplicative 
work,  and  adding  even  more  consular  positions  and  locations,  all 
efforts that are underway. 

Mr. Chairman, we are also quite sensitive to the need to balance 
the  sometimes  competing  interests  of  post-9/11  security  with  ease 
of travel, something you mentioned in your opening comments. Our 
airlines frequently comment on the so-called ‘‘hassle factor’’ that se-
curity  presents.  But  at  the  end  of  the  day,  we  accept  the  reality 
that, in some instances, there are necessary tradeoffs. 

ATA  has  been  working  very  closely  with  government  agencies  to 
implement these initiatives. We have long been an advocate for full 
coordination  among  government  agencies,  a  problem  that  exists  at 
many  different  levels,  and  support  a  DHS-led  ‘‘single  face’’  at  U.S. 
ports of entry. 

I want to reiterate, we support the fundamental objectives in the 
Blueprint,  to  speed  passengers  through  airports,  to  expedite  visa 
processing,  and  enhance  security,  and  to  make  the  travel  experi-
ence  more  enjoyable.  For  the  most  part,  we  think  these  objectives 
are, in fact, being addressed by the State Department, the Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security  and  the  Commerce  Department,  but 
they  could  clearly  be  done  with  more  vigor  and  with  a  greater 
sense  of  urgency,  which  we  encourage  this  Committee  to  enforce. 
America  must  effectively  compete  for  international  visitors,  or 
millions  of  travelers  will  take  billions  of  dollars  that  they  would 
have spent here, and go elsewhere. Our airlines are eager to bring 
more international visitors to America, so that they can experience 
firsthand what we already know—America is a great country to do 
business with, and to visit. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. May follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, AIR TRANSPORT 

ASSOCIATION 

Good afternoon, Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens. I appreciate being 

here. 

We  have  just  heard  testimony  about  the  ‘‘Blueprint  to  Discover  America.’’  Their 
three  main  goals—a  faster  and  more  secure  visa  system,  more  rapid  processing  of 
passengers  at  airports,  and  creating  a  more  welcoming  environment  for  inter-
national passengers—are goals that we all agree upon. 

The  good  news—and  I  am  sure  it  is  the  result  of  the  good  work  by  Partnership 
members,  is  that  these  are  also  goals  that  are  already  being  addressed  by  several 
Federal agencies. 

The  fact  that  we  are  sitting  together  today  tells  us  that  there  are  a  lot  of  com-
mitted  people  working  together  on  these  issues  in  the  Administration,  in  affected 
businesses, and in the airlines. 

The  Rice-Chertoff  Initiative,  the  DHS/State  Department  ‘‘Secure  Borders,  Open 
Doors’’  initiative,  the  US–VISIT  program,  and  the  Commerce  Department’s  U.S 
Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory  Board,  have  all  focused  on  these  same  goals  to  im-
prove the international traveler experience. 

These  government  initiatives,  such  as  E-passports,  model  airports,  developing  a 
‘‘single portal’’ for transmission of passenger information, adding new consular posi-
tions and decreasing the wait time for visa applicants, are going a long way toward 
improving the passenger experience. As I compared the government’s programs with 
the  objectives  of  the  ‘‘Blueprint,’’  I  felt  that  those  ‘‘Blueprint’’  objectives  were  being 
addressed. 

Having  noted  the  consistency  of  the  objectives  between  the  ‘‘Blueprint’’  and  the 
government  initiatives,  there  is  one  glaring  inconsistency.  The  ‘‘Blueprint  to  Dis-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18

cover  America’’  goes  against  one  of  the  key  recommendations  put  forth  by  the  gov-
ernment.  The  Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory  Board  raised  concerns  about  imposing 
taxes on passengers. It explained how those can ‘‘increase the cost of travel and can 
dampen demand for inbound travel.’’

The ‘‘Blueprint’’ proposes to pay for all these initiatives with a $5 fee for ‘‘all trav-
elers  leaving  the  United  States  via  air’’  or  with  a  charge  of  approximately  $10  to 
be  added  to  the  cost  of  ‘‘purchasing  the  airline  ticket.’’  To  be  fair,  the  ‘‘Blueprint’’ 
offered a third funding alternative, the issuance of $1 billion in tax free bonds. 

Why  would  we  want  to  charge  passengers  more  at  the  same  time  we  are  trying 

to get more of them visit the U.S.? That just does not make any sense. 

I  would  like  to  remind  the  Committee  that  international  airline  passengers  are 
already  paying  approximately  $50  in  U.S.  taxes  and  fees  for  each  trip  to  America. 
What  passengers  should  expect  for  $50  is  an  efficient  system  to  get  them  through 
our airports. 

Travel  and  tourism  create  spending  of  over  $650  billion  a  year  in  the  U.S.  and 
generate approximately $100 billion in additional taxes for state, local, and Federal 
governments.  If  more  needs  to  be  done  to  expedite  handling  airline  passengers  or 
processing visas, and it does, the Federal Government needs to commit to use a por-
tion of those additional tax revenues to these efforts. 

The ‘‘Blueprint’’ also says that ‘‘all foreign travelers into the U.S. should be greet-

ed at the inspection booth with the words ‘Welcome to the United States’.’’

While  I  appreciate  a  warm  welcome—it  is  hard  for  me  to  support  charging  pas-

sengers a $5 fee to purchase a smile and a greeting. 

The ATA strongly favors securing America’s borders, and we can do that by elimi-
nating  inadequate  processes  and  transitioning  to  electronic  visa  application  forms, 
making visa appointments online, sharing data among government agencies to avoid 
duplicative work, and adding even more consular positions and locations. 

ATA has been working very closely with government agencies to implement these 
initiatives.  We  have  long  been  an  advocate  for  full  coordination  among  government 
agencies and support a DHS-lead ‘‘single face’’ at U.S. airports of entry. 

I  want  to  reiterate—we  support  these  fundamental  changes  in  the  ‘‘Blueprint’’  to 
speed passengers through airports, to expedite visa processing and enhance security, 
and to make the travel experience more enjoyable. We think they are already being 
addressed by the State Department, the DHS, and the Commerce Department—but 
that they could be done with a little more vigor and with a greater sense of urgency. 
America has to effectively compete for those visitors or otherwise millions of trav-
elers will take the billions that they would have spent here, and spend it elsewhere. 
Our  airlines  are  eager  to  bring  more  international  visitors  to  America  so  they  can 
experience  firsthand  what  we  already  know—that  America  is  a  great  country  to  do 
business with, and to visit. 

Thank you.

leagues. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. May, thank you very much. 
Let  me  ask  a  number  of  questions,  and  then  turn  to  my  col-

First, if the recommendations that you suggest are implemented, 
from  what  countries  would  you  expect  that  we  would  see  the  larg-
est  increase  in  travelers  to  the  United  States?  Does  anyone  have 
an estimate of that? Mr. Porter? 

Mr. PORTER. Yes, the Blueprint, as defined and described, would 
focus on international arrivals from overseas travelers, so we would 
see  the  largest  amount  of  those  coming—increasing  the  contribu-
tion  from  England,  we’d  see  an  increased  contribution  from  Japan 
and  from  China,  which  are  already  big  contributors,  but  we  have 
seen  decline.  Similarly,  Brazil  has  shown  significant  decline  in  the 
past 5 years, so that would be another country of focus, as well. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  Discover  America  Partnership  has  pro-
vided  a  blueprint  outlining  objectives  and  tactics  in  a  number  of 
very specific areas, which is helpful, it seems to me, in terms of our 
evaluation of them. 

I want to talk about the return on investment where we, too, em-
brace  these  ideas.  What  would  be  the  benefits  of  such  a  program, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19

and what do you believe would be the return on investment for our 
country to pursue such a program? 

Mr. PORTER. Very, very fair question. 
First,  in  the  construct  of  this  strategic  plan,  very  similar  to  the 
way we would pursue this inside any one of the companies that we 
represent, this is a combination of a variety of options among many 
that  were  evaluated.  And  these  come  forward  as  being  what  we 
think  of  as  some  of  the  strongest,  but  clearly  open  to  review,  dis-
cussion, and debate, sort of as we’re having here today. 

That  said,  within  the  three  component  parts—improvement  in 
the  visa  process,  we  think,  is  an  investment  initially  at  about  $50 
million, improvements in the entry procedures is about $50 million, 
and  then  the  notion  of  improving  perceptions  is  an  investment  of 
about  $200  million.  And,  as  we  would  execute  down  that  path, 
clearly we think fixing the first two is the right place to start with 
that resourcing. 

Once  that  would  be  agreed  to,  having  passed  through  some  of 
those  objectives  as  benchmarks,  thresholds  we’ve  laid  out,  then 
you’d move into the communications component, and the return as 
noted in there, we see as being sizeable. 

And  I  think  Jay  did  a  nice  job  sizing  that,  it  is  to  return  us  to 
a  market  share  position  that  reflects,  first,  covering  the  decline—
we’ve  gone  from  about  a  7.5  percent  share  to  a  6  percent  share—
that  one  and  a  half  points  is  roughly  the  10  million  visitors  that 
we’ve  described  with  the  corresponding  economic  benefits.  And  the 
pie has gotten bigger at the same time. 

So,  not  only  have  we  lost  position,  but  the  pie  has  improved,  so 

it’s sort of a double loss of position. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  May  seemed  to  suggest  that  the  Rice-
Chertoff  joint  vision  has  created  some  progress  in  a  number  of 
areas,  and  that  perhaps  it  could  be  improved  a  bit,  but  I  think,  I 
think you seem to suggest that there has been substantial progress 
in these areas. 

Do  all  of  you  agree  with  that,  or  is,  or  do—?  I  mean,  I  assume 
that  the  reason  you’ve  put  this  together  is  you  believe  much  more 
needs to be done, is that correct? 
Mr. RASULO. If I may, Senator. 
I think that we all agree that progress has been made, and Rice-
Chertoff,  in  fact,  was  used  as  an  input  to  this  blueprint  in  many 
ways, and gave us a vocabulary that we could share with both the 
State  Department  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  in 
really trying to secure the very same goals. 

I  think  the  Blueprint  pushes  a  little  further  in  the  use  of  tech-
nologies in specific reviews of staffing, and tries to isolate the prob-
lems with specific answers. 

It  also  speaks  to  the  area  of  promotion,  to  which  the  Rice–
Chertoff  initiative  did  not  speak.  And,  if  I  may,  just  add  on  the 
issue  of  return,  we  have  some  information  about  valuable—the 
value  of  promotion  in  terms  of  return,  both  in  terms  of  spending, 
and in terms of taxes. 

The  input  here  comes  from  a  number  of  things—sort  of  an  aca-
demic  study  from  a  group  from  Oxford,  an  Oxford  organization—
I  don’t  remember  the  exact  name,  it’s  in  the  Blueprint—that 
showed that well-executed programs can return, in terms of spend-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20

ing,  up  to  75  to  1,  but  probably  on  average,  35  to  1,  if  you  look  at 
programs around the world. 

In my home state, the State of California, we had a bit of a con-
trol  experiment  in  that  we  promoted  California  internationally  for 
a  number  of  years,  and  then  the  funding  was  cut  off  and  we  lost 
it, we saw the effect down, and when it was reinstated, we saw the 
effect  back  up,  and  that  was  about  14  to  1.  On  average,  we  think 
in terms of tax revenue, the average is probably around 6 to 1. 

Senator  DORGAN.  You’re  correct  that  the  Rice-Chertoff  initiative 
did not deal with the issue of promotion, but just one final point—
other countries that are involved in promotion and a greater activ-
ity here to try to get a better share for their countries of the inter-
national  travelers.  Are  they  paying  for  these  initiatives  through—
the  public  sector?  The  private  sector?  Or  a  combination?  Do  you 
have any information about that? 

Mr.  RASULO.  Most  are  public,  public  funding.  There  are  some 
that  are  public/private  partnerships,  with  some  matching.  Cali-
fornia  is  an  example  of  that.  There’s  contribution  from  the  private 
sector,  which  is  more  than  equally  matched,  but  as  a  substantial 
contribution  from  the  State  of  California.  So,  there  are  many  pub-
lic/private  partnerships,  but  most  have  substantial  government 
funding, as part of them. Canada, as an example, I believe is com-
pletely publicly funded. 

Senator DORGAN. I’m going to have to ask other questions at an-

other go round. 

Mr.  TISCH.  Senator,  if  I  can  just  add  to  that,  we  have  released, 
today,  this  document  which  is  the  1-year  review  of  Rice-Chertoff. 
And  it  is  appropriate  that  it  is  the  day  that  we’re  talking  to  you 
about extending some of the ideas here, but then adding the Blue-
print to it. 

What  the  Blueprint  does  is  put  aside  parochial  concerns  of  var-
ious aspects of the travel and tourism industry, and works together 
toward  a  greater  good.  And  when  you  ask  about  return  on  invest-
ment,  I  think  you  can  look  at  the  financial  return,  which  my  col-
leagues  have  discussed  a  bit,  and  it  really  focuses  on  some  of—all 
of the Senators’ opening comments, about helping us with the posi-
tive balance of trade. 

Our  industry  is  uniquely  poised  to  be  a  vehicle  for  job  creation, 
and  for  economic  development.  I  serve,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  com-
ments, as Chairman of New York City’s Convention of Visitor’s Bu-
reau,  and  our  industry  is  growing  and  we  continue  to  create  jobs. 
To give you a sense of how important that international traveler 
is,  we  had  a  record  year  in  2006—44  million  people  visited  New 
York  City.  Of  that,  only  18  percent  were  from  international  des-
tinations, but they were responsible for 45 percent of all the visitor 
spending. That’s why we need the international traveler. They stay 
longer, and they spend more money. 

Now,  you  switch  to  the  intangible  results,  and  as  we  all  know, 
and we’re all deeply concerned about the image of America, Ameri-
cans,  and  American  brands  overseas  is  at  an  all-time  low.  The  re-
sults  show  that  when  you  come  to  this  country,  you  leave  with  a 
more positive image of us as a Nation. And when you combine the 
tangible  and  the  intangible,  we  think  that  the  Blueprint  becomes 
the path to help our country on many fronts. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tisch, thank you. 
Senator Inouye? 
The  CHAIRMAN.  About  25  years  ago,  Ireland,  the  government  of 
Ireland,  spent  more  money  promoting  the  Blarney  Stone  than  the 
United  States  did  for  the  whole  country.  What  improvement  have 
we had? Are we spending more than Ireland? 

Mr. RASULO. Well, let me—let me answer that. From a nationally 
coordinated  perspective,  overseen  by  a  Federal  agency  of  any  sort, 
or  a  centralized  message,  we  spend  zero.  So  we  haven’t,  I  guess, 
if  they’re  spending  anything  on  the  Blarney  Stone  then  it’s  more 
than  us.  And  Ireland,  in  fact,  is  one  of  the  many  nations  that 
spends against national tourism. 

Needless  to  say,  Senators,  we  as  private  entities,  do  invest  in 
promotion overseas, but we cannot fill the essential role that a cen-
tralized,  federally  overseen  program  can  do.  Particularly,  now  that 
we  know  the  biggest  inhibitors  are  the  entry  process  and  the  visa 
process, there is no private entity or state entity, that would be ei-
ther a trusted source of that information, or the appropriate source 
of that information. 

So,  I  think,  to  answer  your  question,  there  hasn’t  been  an  im-

The CHAIRMAN. Well, what countries have been the most success-

ful in attracting international visitors? 

Mr. PORTER. We have that detailed within the Blueprint. 
Australia  certainly  jumps  to  the  top  of  that  list  as  having  been 
highly effective in focused programs in spending, Canada would be 
another  example  of  a  country  that  has  done  quite  well  on  that 
front,  some  of  the  European  countries  have  stepped  into  that,  as 
well. So they are wildly, most all countries for whom this industry 
is a significant contributor, are significantly ahead of the spending 
patterns of the United States. 

The CHAIRMAN. What sort of visa and security processes do these 

provement. 

countries have, as compared to the United States? 

Mr. PORTER. You’ll find in there, again, details on that. We know, 
and  many  of  us  travel  frequently,  England,  Israel  and  others  have 
been  far  more  advanced  in  using  technology  to  advantage  entry 
into  those  countries.  Those  are  good  models.  Australia  has  also 
been  advanced  in  using  technology  to  make  it  fast  through  the 
booking  process  to  get  access  to  that  country.  So,  I  think  they  are 
definitely good models that we can emulate in this country, for cer-
tain. 

Mr.  TISCH.  And  if  you  look  at  the  historic  competitors  of  the 
United States—Australia, and Japan, Italy—what we’re now seeing 
is  a  big  push  by  Middle  Eastern  countries,  such  as  Dubai,  Abu 
Dhabi,  to  grab  a  larger  market  share  of  conventions,  conferences, 
by  building  enormous  meeting  halls  and  hotel  facilities,  res-
taurants—the  whole  travel  and  tourism  infrastructure.  They  are 
throwing  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to  attract  U.S.  business 
that  might  now  go  to  Las  Vegas,  New  York,  or  Orlando,  to  their 
shores. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  There’s  one  thing  in  common  with  these  coun-

tries—the government is involved. 

Mr.  TISCH.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  government  is  abso-

lutely involved, sir. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22

The  CHAIRMAN.  Last  September,  I  think  the  organization  sub-
mitted  recommendations  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce?  What  has 
happened? Have they been implemented? 

Mr.  RASULO.  Senator,  it  just  so  happened  that  yesterday,  the 
U.S.  Travel  and  Tourism  Advisory  Board  had  a  meeting  with  the 
Secretary,  and  reports  are  out  from  the  Department  of  State  and 
Homeland  Security  on  some  of  the  recommendations.  And  I  think 
there—there  is  no,  no  doubt  there  has  been  incremental  improve-
ment in the processes. 

The  model  airport  program  from  the  Rice-Chertoff  Initiative  has 
had  some  advancement,  there  has  been  some  improvement  on  the 
visa side, but I think that we’ve only scratched the surface in find-
ing  the  efficiencies  that  technology  and  appropriate  staffing  levels 
can  provide,  and  haven’t  scratched  the  surface  at  all,  although  it 
was  not  a  recommendation  of  the,  of  that  particular  paper—have 
not scratched the surface at all on the area of promotion and com-
munication. 

I  would  like  to  add,  by  the  way,  that  since  it’s  referenced,  and 
I do chair that committee, it was referenced that the committee ar-
gued against the collection of fees or taxes from travelers. 

Actually,  what  it  recommended  was  against  fees  that  don’t  ben-
efit  travel.  And  clearly,  the  aspects  of  the  Blueprint  we’re  dis-
cussing today are to the benefit of travel. 

The CHAIRMAN. We have just implemented the new visa require-
ments in the Western Hemisphere. What will be the impact on visi-
tors from those countries? 

Mr.  RASULO.  Well,  it’s  hard  to  know,  and  I’ll  defer  to  my  col-
leagues,  but  right  now,  a  very  small  percentage  of  our  travel  from 
Canada  and  to  Canada  is  by  air,  relative  to  ground  crossing.  So 
far—we heard yesterday from a Director of Homeland Security, Mi-
chael  Jackson,  that  90  percent  of  the  passengers  arriving  in  the 
U.S. or going to Canada by air—do have passports. And that those 
who  didn’t  have  been  accommodated,  to  date,  in  the  early  days,  in 
ways that no one has been turned around, yet. 

I  think  the  real  test  against  the  WHTI  is  how  efficiently  we  can 
implement  the  border  crossing.  Which  is—which  are  frequent,  are 
often  not  what  you  and  I  would  think  of  as  travel,  but  a  trip  to  a 
movie,  a  trip  to  go  shopping,  a  trip  to  a  drug  store  that’s  at  the 
end  of  town  can  be  a  border  crossing  in  a  lot  of  our  border  states. 
And  so,  we’ve  yet  to  see  the  impact  of  the  ultimate  implementa-
tion.  We’re  all  working  quite  hard  to  be  sure  that  that  is  imple-
mented with a deadline of—thanks to some of you—of mid-2009 to 
be  sure  that  that  gets  implemented  in  a  way  that  won’t  affect  our 
flow  from  Canada  which,  of  course,  is  our  most  important  trading 
partner, and our most important travel partner in the world. 

Mr.  PORTER.  And  Chairman,  if  I  may,  just  give  some  further  il-
lustration to that. Jay has pointed out at the outset of WHTI, with 
regard  to  air  arrivals,  we  knew  going  into  the  penetration  of  pass-
port  holders  for  those  arrivals  is  pretty  high,  so  that  has  been 
borne  out  to  be  the  case,  and  it  has  not  had  significant  negative 
impact. 

As we move to land arrivals—whether from Mexico or from Can-
ada—lodging  alone,  we  have  roughly  50,000  hotels  in  the  United 
States,  and  about  25  percent  of  those  are  within  a  hundred  miles 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23

of either the Canada or the Mexico border. And it is not an uncom-
mon  thing  to  have  significant  cross-border  travel  to  enjoy  many  of 
the  amenities  of  the  United  States,  a  broad  array  of  industries. 
Penetration  of  passports  in  the  population  at  large  is  sub-30  per-
cent  in  the  United  States,  similarly,  sub-40  percent  in  Canada,  so 
we  think  the  potential  for  dramatic  impact  is  significant,  which 
goes back to the need to have coordinated communications on these 
initiatives,  so  we  get  the  security  right,  but  also  make  sure  the 
doors stay open. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  notice  my  time  is  up,  I  thank  you  very  much, 

Mr. Chairman. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Stevens? 
Senator  STEVENS.  In  the  nineties,  there  was  an  organization 
called the U.S. Tourism Organization. Are you any of you aware of 
that one? 

Mr. TISCH. I was a member. 
Senator STEVENS. What happened to that? 
Mr.  TISCH.  It  lost  its  funding  through  the  Commerce  Depart-

ment. 

Senator STEVENS. It was federally funded to start? 
Mr.  TISCH.  Yes,  it  was.  And  it  was  through  the  Commerce  De-

partment, sir, and it lost its funding. 

Senator STEVENS. Are you of the opinion that there must be Fed-

eral funding to initiate this new program? 

Mr.  TISCH.  We  are  of  the  opinion  that  there  are  private  sector 
ways  working  with  government,  as  Jay  outlined,  and  we  threw  a 
few  ideas  out  there.  But,  we  do  feel  that  we  need  some  assistance 
in  this,  but  the  private  sector  understands  our  role,  and  our  re-
sponsibilities,  and  wants  to  work  with  government  to  find  ways  to 
pay for the programs that we are calling for. 

Senator  STEVENS.  We  have  initiated  other  programs  such  as  the 
Pitman-Robertson  program  that  deals  with  firearms  and  archery 
and  activities  like  that—they’re  basically  what  we  call  a  user-pay 
benefit trust fund concept—have you examined that concept? 

Mr.  PORTER.  I  don’t  believe  we  did  directly,  no.  And  just,  again, 
going  back  to  the  intent  behind  the  Blueprint—we  thought  it  im-
portant, as we bring this initiative forward—to be honest about the 
fact  that  it  requires  resourcing.  And  we  felt  that  it  was  important 
to  try  to  put  a  fine  line  on  the  quantum  of  what  that  resourcing 
might be. And we also thought it was a requirement to put forward 
a variety of options as one approach to understanding how it might 
be resourced. 

It  would  be  our  intent  that  this  would  advance  into  further  dis-
cussion  to  further  validate  alternate  resources.  We’re  not  nec-
essarily committed to, or married to any one of these, but we clear-
ly  know  that  resourcing  is  a  requirement,  and  we  think  there  are 
a variety of options to sort that out. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Have  you  presented  this  plan  to  the  Depart-

ment of Commerce now? 

Mr.  RASULO.  We  did.  We  did  present  that  plan  yesterday  at  the 

board meeting to Secretary Gutierrez and his staff, yes. 

Senator  STEVENS.  And  this  Discover  America  Partnership  Cor-
poration—you  envision  that  that  would  be  authorized  by  Congress 
to start with? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24

Mr.  PORTER.  Actually,  it  could  potentially  be  one  approach  to 
putting funding forward and having some oversight body in a rela-
tionship  between  the  private  sector  and  the  government,  advance 
this initiative, yes. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I want to make sure we understand that, 
if  we  proceed  to  have  such  a  corporation  created  and  implement  a 
program  through  legislation,  does  that  meet  your  desire?  Do  you 
want to cooperate with that? 

Mr. PORTER. Yes, we do. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Now,  Mr.  May,  I  understand  what  you’re  say-
ing  about  exit  fees  and  we’ve  all  had  an  acquaintance  with  that 
sort  of  thing.  Is  your  industry,  though,  prepared  to  work  with  the 
travel agencies, the travel industry, to facilitate the development of 
the Partnership program and otherwise? 

Mr.  MAY.  Senator  Stevens,  we  have  endorsed  the  principles  of 
the Blueprint, and are happy to work with it. We have questioned, 
as  you  might  imagine,  some  of  the  funding  formulas  that  are  at-
tached to that, but I would suggest, in a manner reminiscent of the 
opening comments of Chairman Inouye, there are billions of dollars 
that  are  currently  being  spent  on  many  of  these  different  pro-
grams—whether  it’s  US–VISIT,  visa  exit,  Secure  Flight,  AQQ—we 
can  go  down  a  very  long  list.  I  would  hope  that  this  Committee 
would  undertake,  at  the  outset,  to  bring  up  representatives  from 
the State Department, the Department of Homeland Security, TSA, 
CBP, ICE, and the other multiple alphabet soup organizations that 
are responsible for a very diverse enforcement of issues. 

And  if  the  State  Department  suggests  that  they  are  going  to 
make  significant  progress  with  their  programs—they’ve  issued  re-
cent  press  releases  to  that  effect—I  think  this  Committee  has  an 
opportunity  to  hold  their  feet  to  the  fire,  and  make  sure  the  pro-
grams  we  have  today  are  cost-effective,  efficient,  and  are  doing 
what they are intended to do, which is not to say that we shouldn’t 
have  more  promotion,  but  I  think  there’s  a  lot  of  work  that  needs 
to  be  done  on  making  sure  all  of  these  programs  are  coordinated, 
and  that  we  have  a  command  and  control  structure  that  works  ef-
fectively for the benefit of the international traveler. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  think  some  of  you  were  involved  with  the 
funds  that—when  I  was  chairman  of  the  Appropriations  Com-
mittee,  we  were  able  to  get  Congress  to  approve—those  monies 
weren’t  all  spent.  Was  that  because  of  a  lack  of  infrastructure  in 
the  Executive  Branch  to  carry  it  out,  or  was  there  just  not  an 
agreement within the industry of where they should be spent? 

Mr.  RASULO.  I  had  the  pleasure  of  chairing  the  advisory  com-
mittee  that  the  legislation  that  you  submitted  called  out  for  the 
spending  of  $50  million  that  was  appropriated  for  this  very  pur-
pose.  And  that  was  an  advisory  committee  to  the  Commerce  De-
partment. 

Frankly  by  the  time  the  effort  was  organized,  by  the  time  the 
board  members  were  named—and,  in  fact,  two  of  us  were  on  that 
board—by  the  time  it  was  named,  it  was  already  6  or  7  months 
into  the  year,  and  it  wasn’t  that  we  couldn’t  figure  out  how  to 
spend the money, we knew exactly how we were going to spend it—
we  couldn’t  get  through  the  Federal  approval  process  quickly 
enough before the money got swept up in an omnibus bill, the om-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25

nibus bill at the end of the year. And we were left with $8 million 
which we spent about $6 million-plus in what we called a pilot pro-
gram in the U.K., which I’m happy to say seemed to have had very 
positive results. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  last—I  see  my  time  is  up—the  Duck 
Stamp,  you  know,  sticks  in  my  mind  as  a  hunter.  Hunters  have 
supported the program which provides the money that assures con-
servation of the species that they hunt. It has been totally accepted 
by  all  involved  in  the  hunting  world  of  our  country.  Have  you  ex-
amined  the  ability  of  the  industry  to  start  out  and  raise  money 
through some mechanism, such as a stamp or a certificate of mem-
bership?  There  are  literally  hundreds  of  thousands  of  people  that 
are  the  periphery  of  your  industry.  And  it  seems  that  that  would 
raise  money,  and  have  a  continuous  flow  of  money,  if  the  program 
was  successful.  Have  you  looked  at  that  form  of  mechanism  of 
funding? 

Mr.  PORTER.  That  particular  mechanism,  no,  we  didn’t.  That’s  a 
great  suggestion  as  we  advance  this  into  the  working  group,  and 
think through what those broader options might be. 

Thank you for that. 
Senator STEVENS. Well, I think Senator Inouye and I have looked 
forward  to  working  with  you,  because  certainly  our  two  states  are 
very  heavily  supported  by  the  travel  and  tourism  industry.  And 
we’ve  seen  the  decline  that  you’ve  mentioned,  and  we’d  like  very 
much to work with you to try and sort of bring back this industry, 
and have it bloom as it should, in terms of our total economy. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE,
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Panel, thank you for your testimony. I appreciate you having this 
hearing—tourism  and  travel  is  a  very  vital  industry  in  my  home 
State  of  South  Dakota,  and  as  the  Senator  from  North  Dakota  is 
also  aware,  there  are  a  lot  of  folks  that  come  to  our  part  of  the 
world  year  in  and  year  out.  And,  in  fact,  in  2006,  visitor  spending 
in  South  Dakota  was  $864  million,  so  almost  a  billion  dollars  a 
year  is  being  spent  in  the  state,  and  that’s  a  7  percent  increase 
over the previous year. 

So,  we’ve  seen  steady  growth  in  tourism  spending  in  South  Da-
kota, and with the exception of the downturn right after 2001, that 
has  been  a  trend  line  that  has  been  pretty  consistent.  And,  it’s  a 
big  job  creator.  We  have  about  33,000  jobs  in  South  Dakota  that 
are related to our state’s tourism industry. 

And  I  think  it  makes  sense  to  think  strategically  about  how  we 
can  increase  the  number  of  international  visitors  who  come  to  the 
United  States.  The  money  that  they  spend  here  in  this  country  is 
money  that  we  wouldn’t  otherwise  realize  in  our  economy,  and  so 
I look forward to working with others here in Congress, as well as 
with  the  Administration  and  industry  groups  to  make  sure  that 
we’re  effectively  competing  for  that  share  of  international  tourists. 
And, I guess I just have a couple of questions for you. As I men-
tioned,  tourism  constitutes  about  $900  million  for  South  Dakota 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26

annually,  one  of  the  proposals  that  you’re  talking  about—the  Dis-
cover America Partnership calls for the creation of a federally spon-
sored, nonprofit corporation to increase our country’s market share 
of  international  tourists.  And  I  guess  one  of  my  questions  would 
have  to  do  with  how  that  would  be  organized,  and  would  that 
Board of Directors include representation from rural tourism, from 
that part of the industry, as well? 

Mr.  PORTER.  Yes,  as  conceived,  it  would  be  as  far-reaching  as 
could be. And within my own accountability, while we’re a big cor-
poration,  I  represent  the  voice  of  about  2,000  franchisees  who  are 
very much attached to business in their local constituency. And we 
conceive  this  to  be  as  broad  a  representation  as  could  be  accom-
plished, and at the same time, make it a group that could advance 
the initiative. 

Senator  THUNE.  Just  as  a  follow-up  question—and  this  is  for 
anybody  on  the  panel—but  what  else  can  we  be  doing  to  ensure 
that  the  rural  destinations  in  our  country  are  getting  good  expo-
sure  among  potential  international  travelers?  Obviously,  we  want 
people  to  visit  Disneyland  and  Disneyworld—which  we  know  they 
will—we also want them to visit Mt. Rushmore, and maybe to come 
through North America on their way to South Dakota. 

Mr.  RASULO.  Well,  Senator,  in  answer  to  your  question,  I  think 
the only vehicle by which we can imagine promotion of places that 
don’t  have  big,  private-entity  destinations,  is  through  a  nationally 
coordinated program, that markets America around the world. We, 
at  Disney,  are  always  going  to  have  the  resources,  my  colleagues 
at this table will have the resources, their companies will have the 
resources  to  promote  our  own  businesses  and  big  destinations,  so 
will  Las  Vegas,  so  will  New  York,  so  will  San  Francisco,  et  cetera. 
When  you  get  to  small—the  Faulkner  Museum,  Mt.  Rushmore, 
the National Parks—the funds are simply not there, and there’s no 
entity  large  enough  to  speak  to  the  world  about  South  Dakota  or 
North Dakota, or Mississippi or Arkansas or many other states. 

So,  the  beauty  of  a  nationally  coordinated  program  that  hooks 
people on the idea of coming to America at all as a destination, and 
allows  local  convention  bureaus,  with  very  small  funds  after  that, 
to come in on the Internet, when people are not seeking, where am 
I  going  to  go  as  a  country?  But,  what  am  I  going  to  do  when  I  get 
there? They typically go to the Internet, and that allows, you know, 
kind of an even playing field for all destinations. 

So,  I  think  that’s  one  way  to  think  about,  how  can  we  help  pro-
mote distant, small, rural tourism? This is one of the most effective 
ways. 

Mr. PORTER. And, if I may just add to that, something we spoke 
about  earlier  is  the  impact  of  the  Western  Hemisphere  Travel  Ini-
tiative,  which  has  potentially  great  impact  for  you,  being  a  close 
State to the border of Canada. And it would be an organization like 
this  that  would  lift  up  those  issues,  and  put  that  communication 
out. 

As  Jay  has  pointed  out,  all  of  us  as  independents  spend  a  lot  of 
money  for  specific  venues,  brands,  offers—what  we  don’t  have  is 
this  comprehensive  voice  on  behalf  of  America,  and  what  it  means 
to come here and reinforcing a balance between policy and opening 
the doors. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27

Mr. TISCH. Senator, your question is very appropriate, especially 
coming  from  your  state,  because  it’s  important  to  understand  that 
travel and tourism is not just about corporate America, it’s not just 
about  the  names  that  are  represented  at  this  table.  It’s  about  the 
Mom  and  Pops,  who  have  been  in  this  business  for  many,  many 
years,  who  need  the  traveler  to  bring  the  income  so  that  they  can 
raise their families and educate their kids. 

It  is  interesting  to  note  that  we  met  with  Congressman  Porter 
and  Congressman  Farr  of  the  House  Travel  and  Tourism  Caucus 
this morning and Congressman Porter raised an idea that, I think, 
maybe it’s time for us to give some thought to. 

In  1995,  there  was  the  first-ever  White  House  Conference  on 
Travel  and  Tourism.  And  it  brought  together  about  1,500  individ-
uals  that  represented  all  50  states  in  every  aspect  of  travel  and 
tourism. 

And it really was the first time that the—once thought of as dis-
parate  entities—travel  and  tourism  were  able  to  meet  in  a  setting 
to  talk  about  issues  that  affect  all  of  us—not  just  hotels,  airlines, 
cruise lines, or the smaller operators. 

And maybe now the time has come for us to have another White 
House  conference  on  travel  and  tourism.  The  issues  have  changed, 
the  industry  has  gotten  bigger,  the  contributions  that  we  make  to 
this country are now more understood. And what struck me to your 
question,  Senator,  was  that  at  this  conference,  now  12  years  ago, 
every  state  sent  a  representative.  So,  the  smaller  operators  were 
able to voice their concerns, and look at ways that we can all work 
together to promote the industry. 

Senator  THUNE.  I  know  that  marketing,  clearly,  is  the  name  of 
the  game,  and  you  all  do  it  very  well.  We’ve  got  some  success  sto-
ries in my State—I don’t know if you’ve ever heard of a place called 
Wall  Drug,  but  if  you  travel  anywhere  in  the  Midwest,  you  prob-
ably see signs. 

But, Mr. Rasulo, you mentioned in your testimony that Australia 
and  Canada  spend  about  $113  million  a  year,  and  $58  million  a 
year,  respectively,  on  marketing  their  countries  to  international 
travelers. And I’m wondering if there’s evidence that these expendi-
tures  have  been  effective—have  they  seen  an  increase  in  inter-
national travel as a result of that? 

Mr. RASULO. We believe, and of course this is, you know, the old 
adage about marketing, half of it I don’t know where it goes, I don’t 
know which half works. 

But, we have seen—when you look at the results that these coun-
tries  get,  and  we  look  around  the  world,  and  people  often  say, 
‘‘Well,  of  course,  you  know,  the  U.S.  share  is  dropping,  there  are 
new destinations being added to the map, and they’re sucking away 
shares  of  travel,’’  but  in  fact,  when  you  look  at  the  statistics—all 
of the competitive nations to the U.S. are beneficiaries of the world 
travel  growth.  It  is  only  a  few—and  mostly  the  U.S.—that  are  the 
net losers in share in the growth of travel. And in the case of over-
seas travelers to the U.S., the absolute numbers are declining. 

So,  I  have  to,  I  have  to  assume  that  that  is  in  part  due  to  their 
marketing  out  there,  and  their  ability  to  attract.  Academic  studies 
say  that  this,  the  ratio  of  investment  against  spending  in  those 
countries is on the level, on average, of 35 to 1; tax revenue on the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28

level of 6 to 1; so, I think the evidence indicates that they are, but 
I  couch  what  I  say—and  all  of  my  colleagues  can  understand  this 
well in the private sector—measuring the value of marketing is an 
art, as much as it is a science. 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  and  I  see  my  time  is  expired,  but  I 
appreciate your testimony. I look forward to working with you and 
trying  to  get  a  bigger  share  of  that  international  traveler  dollar 
here in the United States. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  just  make  a  point  on  the  Western 
Hemisphere Travel Initiative. I share a very long border with Can-
ada  in  North  Dakota,  and  we’ve  been  very  concerned  about  this 
issue.  I  believe  when  I  was  chairman  of  an  Appropriations  sub-
committee, just prior to 9/11, 2001, I had offered a Northern Border 
Initiative, which really dealt with security. And I brought to a com-
mittee hearing an orange cone, and placed it on the desk and said, 
‘‘This  is  security  at  a  lot  of  our  border  checkpoints,  and  the  polite 
drivers actually stop and move it as they walk in after the border’s 
closed, or as they drive in, and the impolite drivers will just shred 
it  at  about  60  miles  an  hour.’’  But  that  was  border  security.  That 
has changed at all of those border ports of entry. 

But the proposition that there should be a passport for everyone 
driving back and forth across the border was very troubling. A fam-
ily  of  four  going  up  to  Winnipeg  for  the  day,  getting  passports  for 
$400  or  so  for  the  family—I’ve  been  very  concerned  about  this,  on 
the  Northern  border  and  in  all  of  our  circumstance.  We  need—
there is a kind of a tension between security and tourism and trav-
el, and we need to resolve it in a way that’s thoughtful and serious. 
For  example,  right  now,  we  have  the  new  cards  that  are  being 
proposed.  But,  my  understanding  is,  the  Postal  Service  is  wanting 
$25  per  card,  to  process  the  card.  So,  we’re  trying  to  understand 
what that’s all about. 

Let  me  ask  you  this—I  understand  about  the  Initiative  that  has 
been  offered  by  the  State  Department  and  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  and  I  want  it  to  succeed.  I’ve  seen  some  evi-
dence that there has been some improvement. But, it seems to me, 
not  nearly  enough  improvement.  And  the  fact  is,  government’s  a 
big  bureaucracy,  these  agencies  are  big  bureaucracies,  nobody’s 
ever  accused  them  of  speeding.  It’s  very  hard  for  them  to  change, 
and turn and adapt. 

What if the Congress decided, based on the testimony of you here 
today  that  we  don’t  have  to  do  anything.  This  Rice-Chertoff  Initia-
tive,  that’s  fine,  you  think  it’s  pretty  decent,  moving  in  the  right 
direction, that’s enough. Is that what you’re saying to us? 

done? 

Mr. PORTER. No, it’s not. 
Senator DORGAN. Or do you think much, much more needs to be 

Mr.  PORTER.  We  clearly  think  much,  much  more  needs  to  be 
done.  And  not  dissimilar  to  any  of  our  individual  accountabilities, 
we  all  recognize,  this  is  a  journey  that  we  are  on.  Our  world 
changed  on  September  11th,  we  respect  that.  The  world  continues 
to change, and we respect that. 

We  think  Rice-Chertoff  was  a  great  step  in  the  right  direction, 
and many of us were part of the discussions that led to that activ-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29

ity.  But  it’s  not  as  comprehensive  as  we  think  it  needs  to  be.  We 
don’t  think  it  has  been  resourced  as  effectively  as  it  could  be,  and 
we’ve  called  that  out  here.  And  it  doesn’t  allow  for  what,  we  think 
is one of the most important components, which is communication. 
So,  clearly,  we  are  suggesting  that  we  need  to  advance  that  initia-
tive beyond where we are today. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  make  another  point,  and  ask  a  ques-
tion.  You  want  to  promote  our  country—and,  I  think,  for  a  lot  of 
good  reasons.  You  know,  people  come  to  this  country.  They  think 
well  of  what  they’ve  seen  here  and  what  they  experience  here.  It’s 
very  important  at  a  time  when  our  image  is  suffering  around  the 
world. 

Senator  Stevens  talked  about  the  Duck  Stamp,  or  Ducks  Unlim-
ited—it  was  enormously  successful  as  a  fundraising  device.  Maybe 
there  are  ways  in  the  private  sector  to  do  that.  If  not,  there  are 
calls for suggestions that the public sector finance it. 

Let  me  ask  a  question  about  what  other  countries  are  doing. 
Those  that  are  engaged  in  more  aggressive  promotion  through  ad-
vertising—‘‘Come  to  our  country,  see  our  country,’’  those  countries 
that  are  doing  that,  are  most  of  them  using  public  sector  funding? 
Is that how they’re enhancing their ability to do that? 

Mr. TISCH. Yes, they are using public sector financing. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And,  let  me  ask  about  the  issue  of  an  exit  fee. 
I  understand  the  concern  about  that  from  Mr.  May,  but  having 
traveled some around the world, it’s not unusual to discover on the 
way  out,  you  have  to  stop  at  a  kiosk  someplace,  and  they  want  a 
few bucks from you, for one thing or another. 

These exit fees, if exit fees were, in fact, implemented, how could 
they be implemented in a way in which they did not become a part 
of an airline ticket? 

Mr. PORTER. Yes, I would imagine—as you’ve pointed out—there 
are  a  number  of  mechanisms  that  could  be  explored.  And,  I  think, 
again,  we  are  very  open  to  exploring  those  mechanics.  I  think  the 
key  thing  is  to  understand  the  benefits  of  any  use  of  any  kind  of 
funding, and to make sure that we clearly have enumerated those, 
and have support behind those. 

And  that  aside,  not—just  so  much  of  the  resourcing  challenges 
each one of us faces every day, that you face every day—our sense 
is we can find a collective way to get there, and make it work. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Inouye,  do  you  have  any  additional 

questions? 

The CHAIRMAN. Just a note. 
Hawaii’s  major  industry,  as  you  know,  is  tourism.  It’s  a  multi-
billion  dollar  industry.  But,  what  most  people  are  not  aware  of  is 
that in order to make this a successful industry, we spent a ton of 
money promoting Hawaii. And that’s the only way to do it. 

And right now we’re in the midst of a promotion program of pro-
moting  our  rural  areas.  Five  years  ago,  very  few  people  knew 
where Hana was, or Haiku, or Kohala. These places are now boom-
ing because of promotion and advertising. 

So,  I’m  with  you,  and  I’m  most  grateful  to  you  for  your  testi-
mony,  and  I  hope  we  can  get  together  to  figure  out—as  the  Chair-
man indicated—how to implement your recommendations? 

Thank you very much. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30

Senator DORGAN. Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, gentlemen. I appreciate 

your appearance and your comments. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Your  suggestion  that  we  also  visit  with  the 
agencies  that  are  involved  in  this  is  well-taken,  and  we  will  have 
those  discussions,  and  we  have  actually  had  contact  with  them. 
And  I  think  it  is  in  our  interest  to—certainly  Senator  Inouye,  and 
Senator Stevens, and myself, and others on this Committee—to try 
to see if we can put together some kind of legislation that advances 
the interest of the type we’ve discussed here today, and of the type 
that you’ve described today. 

Again,  the  travel  and  tourism  industry  is  an  enormous  part  of 
our economy. And it creates many jobs which is very important; so, 
too, is security. You’ve all recognized that today in your testimony, 
and  if  we  can  find  a  way  to  work  with  you  and  engage  with  you 
on  this—the  work  you’ve  done  on  the  Discover  America  Partner-
ship—which  I’m  very  impressed  with—if  we  can  continue  to  work 
with you and others, we’d like to find a way to put together a piece 
of legislation that we can offer here in the Congress. 

And,  Senator  Inouye  makes  the  point  that  all  three  of  us  are  on 

the Appropriations Committee, as well. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. PORTER. Very good. 
Mr. TISCH. All the better. 
Senator  DORGAN.  At  any  rate,  we  thank  you  very  much  for  your 

testimony. 

Mr. PORTER. Thank you, Senator. Thank you very much. 
Senator DORGAN. This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

JONATHAN M. TISCH 

Question  1.  Current  law  caps  the  number  of  aviation  security  screeners  that  the 
Transportation Security Administration may hire at 45,000, regardless of the agen-
cy’s  budget.  I’ve  suggested  the  first  thing  we  need  to  do  in  order  to  fully  staff  the 
TSA and keep airline passenger security lines to a minimum is to remove this arbi-
trary  cap  of  45  thousand  security  screeners.  Do  you  agree  Congress  should  remove 
the cap and fund the agency’s staffing needs to an appropriate level? 

Answer. Concerning TSA staffing at airport security checkpoints, we believe there 
should  be  sufficient  staff  at  each  airport  in  order  to  screen  business  and  leisure 
travelers  in  an  efficient  and  effective  manner.  Reducing  lines  at  peak  travel  times 
is  especially  important  in  order  to  ensure  travelers  do  not  miss  their  flights,  and 
this requires a flexible workforce that can be scheduled to meet these hours of peak 
travel  demand.  This  is  especially  important  for  millions  of  international  travelers 
who  land  in  the  U.S.,  but  must  switch  to  domestic  flights  in  order  to  reach  their 
final  destination.  After  being  screened  (inspected)  by  Customs  and  Border  Protec-
tion,  they  must  then  be  screened  by  TSA  agents  before  boarding  a  domestic  flight. 
Having  the  requisite  number  of  screeners  helps  make  the  screening  process  more 
effective and ensures enhanced safety of air travel within the U.S. Often times, fully 
staffing an airport can be met by shifting the number of screeners between airports 
and  adequately  staffing  during  peak  arrival  times.  It  is  important  we  find  a  way 
to stabilize this workforce, which has been characterized by high turnover, low mo-
rale  and  a  high  rate  of  on  the  job  injuries.  We  should  closely  evaluate  the  number 
of  screeners  at  all  our  airports  and  staff  according  to  individual  airport  needs,  and 
it  is  fundamentally  important  to  find  the  balance  between  staffing  and  technology 
to make the system as secure and efficient as possible.

Question  2.  Would  you  agree  that  more  investment  in  passenger  rail  nationwide 
is critical to the future of tourism? Would the U.S. tourism industry be more inter-
ested  in  economic  development  opportunities  spurred  by  transportation  infrastruc-
ture  projects  like  railroad  stations  if  there  were  both  a  Federal  policy  and  Federal 
funding for such projects, like there is for highways and airports? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  travel  industry  has  long  supported  a  well-funded  intermodal 
transportation  system  in  this  country  in  order  to  provide  true  national  mobility  for 
business  and  leisure  travelers.  When  we  are  not  housing,  feeding  or  entertaining 
visitors, various segments of our industry are helping travelers reach their intended 
destination safely and on time. Travel by air, rail, sea, or on the road are all essen-
tial elements for a prosperous travel industry now and in the future. We believe all 
levels  of  government  (especially  including  the  Federal  Government  and  the  states) 
must  make  significant  investments  in  all  modes  of  travel  (including  rail)  in  order 
to  provide  for  safe  and  efficient  movement  of  travelers  to  every  corner  of  this  great 
nation.

Question  3.  Has  your  company  invested  in  economic  development  opportunities 
surrounding intercity passenger railroad stations in other countries? If so, please ex-
plain how the presence of such a station has affected your business. 

Answer.  Loews  Hotels  are  located  principally  in  the  U.S.  (with  the  exception  of 
two  properties  in  Canada).  We  have  no  existing  investments  surrounding  intercity 
passenger railroad stations in other countries nor plans for such currently. However, 
in  looking  at  new  investments,  we  do  recognize  the  importance  of  passenger  rail-
roads  in  bringing  people  to  and  from  destinations  and  the  important  role  railways 
play in the travel and tourism experience. 

(31)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

STEVAN PORTER 

32

Question 1. Should Congress remove the cap and fund TSA’s staffing needs to an 

appropriate level? 

Answer.  As  I  discussed  in  my  testimony  before  the  Committee,  the  Discover 
America  Partnership  believes  the  United  States  needs  to  invest  in  personnel  and 
technology  in  order  to  enhance  our  Nation’s  safety  and  security  and  to  assure  that 
the  process  does  not  discourage  international  travel  to  the  United  States.  The  TSA 
screening  process  is  a  key  link  in  the  system,  both  for  international  and  domestic 
travelers.  The  Partnership  supports  efforts  by  Congress  to  assure  that  the  TSA 
workforce  is  sufficient  to  assure  an  efficient  and  effective  screening  process  at  air-
ports across the country and that it is flexible enough to meet hours of peak travel 
demand.

Question  2.  Would  you  agree  that  more  investment  in  passenger  rail  nationwide 

is critical to the future of tourism? 

Answer.  With  hotel  properties  in  100  countries  and  territories  around  the  world, 
InterContinental  Hotels  Group  understands  that  our  country’s  ability  to  safely  and 
efficiently move travelers from point to point is essential to a robust travel and tour-
ism  industry.  The  Discover  America  Partnership  believes  that  significant  invest-
ment  by  states  and  the  Federal  Government  in  all  modes  of  travel,  including  rail, 
should be a national priority.

Question  3.  Has  your  company  invested  in  economic  development  opportunities 
surrounding intercity passenger railroad stations in other countries? If so, please ex-
plain how the presence of such a station has affected your business. 

Answer. As president for the Americas, I am not aware of any such projects. How-
ever.  we  are  surveying  the  other  IHG  regions,  and  I  will  submit  to  the  Committee 
any examples identified in that survey. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

JAY RASULO 

Question  1.  Current  law  caps  the  number  of  aviation  security  screeners  that  the 
Transportation Security Administration may hire at 45,000, regardless of the agen-
cy’s  budget.  I’ve  suggested  the  first  thing  we  need  to  do  in  order  to  fully  staff  the 
TSA and keep airline passenger security lines to a minimum is to remove this arbi-
trary  cap  of  45  thousand  security  screeners.  Do  you  agree  Congress  should  remove 
the cap and fund the agency’s staffing needs to an appropriate level? 

Answer. Concerning TSA staffing at airport security checkpoints, we believe there 
should  be  sufficient  staff  at  each  airport  in  order  to  screen  business  and  leisure 
travelers  in  an  efficient  and  effective  manner.  Reducing  lines  at  peak  travel  times 
is  especially  important  in  order  to  ensure  travelers  do  not  miss  their  flights,  and 
this requires a flexible workforce that can be scheduled to meet these hours of peak 
travel  demand.  This  is  especially  important  for  millions  of  international  travelers 
who land in the U.S. but must switch to domestic flights in order to reach their final 
destination. After being screened by Customs and Border Protection, they must then 
be  screened  by  TSA  agents  before  boarding  a  domestic  flight.  Also,  having  the  req-
uisite  number  of  screeners  can  also  help  make  the  screening  process  more  effective 
and ensure enhanced safety of air travel within the U.S.

Question 2. I understand your company was interested in developing a passenger 
rail system linking your theme park with the Orlando International Airport. Would 
you agree that more investment in passenger rail nationwide is critical to the future 
of tourism? 

Answer.  Providing  for  safe  and  efficient  movement  of  travelers  in  all  regions  of 
the country is certainly a worthwhile investment. When we are not housing, feeding 
or  entertaining  visitors.  various  segments  of  our  industry  are  helping  travelers 
reach  their  intended  destination  safely  and  on  time.  Travel  by  air,  rail,  sea,  or  on 
the road are all essential elements for a prosperous travel industry now and in the 
future.

Question  3.  Would  the  U.S.  tourism  industry  be  more  interested  in  economic  de-
velopment  opportunities  spurred  by  transportation  infrastructure  projects  like  rail-
road  stations  if  there  were  both  a  Federal  policy  and  Federal  funding  for  such 
projects, like there is for highways and airports? 

Answer.  As  stated  in  response  to  the  previous  question,  we  agree  with  the  U.S. 
travel  industry  in  that  a  well-funded  intermodal  transportation  system,  including 
air, rail, road and sea, is essential. Proper public investment in these areas can spur 
private sector development opportunities.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33

Question  4.  Has  your  company  invested  in  economic  development  opportunities 
surrounding intercity passenger railroad stations in other countries? If so, please ex-
plain how the presence of such a station has affected your business. 

Answer.  New  train  stations  in  France  have  supported  new  development  for 
Disneyland  Resort  Paris,  and  we  believe  these  investments  can  be  worthwhile  for 
spurring private sector development. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

JAMES C. MAY 

Question.  Current  law  caps  the  number  of  aviation  security  screeners  that  the 
Transportation Security Administration may hire at 45,000, regardless of the agen-
cy’s  budget.  I’ve  suggested  the  first  thing  we  need  to  do  in  order  to  fully  staff  the 
TSA and keep airline passenger security lines to a minimum is to remove this arbi-
trary  cap  of  45  thousand  security  screeners.  Do  you  agree  Congress  should  remove 
the cap and fund the agency’s staffing needs to an appropriate level? 

Answer.  The  simple  answer  is  that  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
should  be  given  all  the  resources  it  needs  to  implement,  in  the  most  efficient  and 
effective way, the Congressional mandates in the Aviation Transportation and Secu-
rity  Act  (ATSA).  In  ATSA,  Congress  very  clearly  required  the  Federal  Government 
to provide for the screening of all passengers and property, including cargo, carried 
on  passenger  aircraft.  In  fact,  Congress  specifically  required  that  the  screening 
‘‘shall be carried out by a Federal Government Employee.’’

The security issues facing America and the Department of Homeland Security are 
very  significant.  Indeed,  the  Comptroller  General  of  the  United  States  submitted 
testimony  on  February  7,  2007,  to  the  Congress  on  the  security  challenges  facing 
this country and the DHS. With respects to all modes of travel, GAO complemented 
DHS  by  saying  that  progress  has  been  made  ‘‘particularly  in  aviation’’  and  that 
‘‘DHS and TSA have taken numerous actions to strengthen commercial aviation se-
curity, including strengthening passenger and baggage screening, improving aspects 
of air cargo security, and strengthening the security of international flights and pas-
sengers bound for the United States.’’

That  GAO  testimony  praised  TSA  for  using  covert  testing  and  other  means  to 
measure effectiveness of airport screening systems and for working to enhance pas-
senger  and  baggage  screener  training.  GAO  also  noted  that  TSA  has  modified  air-
port  screening  procedures  based  on  risk.  On  the  negative  side,  GAO  said  that  TSA 
continues  to  face  challenges  in  implementing  a  program  to  match  domestic  airline 
passenger  information  against  terrorist  watch  lists  and  in  ‘‘fielding  needed  tech-
nologies to screen airline passengers for explosives.’’

The  GAO  did  raise  an  across-the-board  criticism  of  DHS  for  not  basing  program 
investments  on  risk  analysis.  I  believe  the  more  detailed  answer  to  your  question 
depends on a thorough risk-analysis of all facets of the security problems facing this 
Nation. Since the air transport industry represents only one segment of the full pic-
ture,  I  would  propose  that  the  Congress  undertake  to  hold  hearings  on  the  matter 
you  raised  so  that  all  the  security  needs  of  the  U.S.  could  properly  be  balanced  be-
fore a decision is made as to whether to raise that cap, or not. 

TSA  has  come  a  long  way  in  just  a  few  years  and  is  doing  an  effective  job  of  en-
suring  the  security  of  our  air  transport  system  within  the  budget  provided  by  the 
Congress.  TSA  has  been  coordinating  with  the  Air  Transport  Association.  The  ATA 
and  our  member  airlines  will  continue  to  work  with  the  TSA  to  address  new  secu-
rity  concerns  and  to  look  for  additional  ways  to  improve  the  experience  of  airline 
passengers. 

Restoring  America’s  Travel  Brand—A  National  Strategy  to  Compete  for
International Visitors (September 5, 2006) has been retained in Committee files.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  16:09 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 034743 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\34743.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

